[[1770, "conrad", "I stayed at the the Conrad Chicago Hotel last winter with my family and I couldn't be happier with are choice. The staff was very polite and helpfull and the rooms were very comfortable and felt like home. I loved the area of chicago the hotel was in there wasnt alot of crim around and i felt safe being in a new city.\n", 1, 1], [563, "homewood", "If you want the downtown experience of a lifetime, with historical living that will bring you back to Chicago in the early 1900's look no further, the dining experience is as comfortable as the stay, service is immaculate, and just as you think things couldn't get any better, you are only a walk away from one of the most exciting cities in America: Chicago with fine dining and a late night rendezvous as exciting as the nightlife, you are sure to have your excitement whims met, and walk away with the memory of a lifetime. Believe me I did. Valued Customer, Josh\n", 1, 1], [1905, "swissotel", "Everything you would would expect from a top-notch hotel and exceeded by the service. The trendy decor and easy to access dining gave us a 'second-wind' pick up after a day of sight-seeing. This hotel is definitely the place that I want to come back to. By the time we left after 4 days and 3 nights, my wife and I wished we had more time to enjoy the restaurant a few more times and the delightful Swiss flare. One of the things we enjoyed the most was seeing the water from our window. The feeling of being pampered can only come from the very gracious hotel staff and this hotel is number 1 in my mind. \n", 1, 1], [484, "conrad", "We stayed here for a weekend trip to Chicago and we will come back and stay here again. It was great place front desk clerks were very helpful.Also we loved the view. Very nice quiet place and upto date and super clean. We will def stay here again highly recommended.\n", 1, 1], [552, "hilton", "The Hilton Hotel helped us make the most of our trip to Chicago. Not only are they centrally located near most of Chi towns hot spots, but they also helped coordinate discounted admissions to various other attractions. The Hilton is very classy with their accommodations. I will be returning at my earliest convenience, be it for business or pleasure.\n", 1, 1], [445, "amalfi", "I was visiting Chicago for a christening with my fiance. I was impressed with this hotel from the moment I checked in. The lobby was exceptionally modern with color and furnishings. Front desk staff was pleasant and helpful, especially Susan, who quickly suggested and reserved a table for us at Keefer's Steakhouse for a late dinner. The room itself was fabulous. Extremely comfortable King sized bed, dual head shower, breathtakingly beautiful views of the city, I couldn't ask for more. After a great nights sleep we awoke to a great FREE breakfast right outside our room! Next we enjoyed a couple's massage and I was treated to a facial as my fiance took a short run through the city. After a day full of shopping we retired to our room and ordered room service that was on time and delicious. Unfortunately we checked out the next day, because I could have stayed there forever. I fully recommend the Amalfi Hotel Chicago for everyone interested in a superior stay. It is truly a beautiful and well appointed hotel.\n", 1, 1], [789, "talbott", "I really loved my stay at the Talbott. My room was amazing! The bathroom (and I am VERY picky about hotel bathrooms) had ample room for all of my stuff, which is a bonus for me. The staff treated me really well and they were very friendly. I was afraid that I'd get a little lost, since it was my first trip to Chicago, but the staff helped me navigate to the downtown area (Rush St./Michigan Ave.-- which are *very* close by). The hotel reminded me of those I'd stayed at in Europe. The room service is 24 hours, which for me, was a bonus because I am up mostly during the nights. This is the *only* place I will ever stay if I visit Chicago again. For a single woman traveling alone to a strange city, this hotel made me feel very safe and comfortable.\n", 1, 1], [1695, "affinia", "We had the pleasure of enjoying a stay at the Affinia Chicago Hotel. We found it conveniently located on E. Superior Street, near many local attractions. The rooms were modern chic with a very urban feel. The pillow menu was awesome, my partner and I have such different preferences, the choices made it easier to sleep like we were at home. The hotel room layout was comfortable and spacious with all the right touches to make our stay perfect! I couldn't believe the amenities available to guests. My Beagle, Betsy enjoyed her stay at the \"Jet Set Pet\" care center. She was pampered as much as I was. It was such a comfort knowing we could bring her along and that we could enjoy our stay without the stress and concern that comes along with traveling and pet ownership! Another feature I personally enjoyed was the Walking Tour Kit. It included an iPod Shuffle pre-loaded with a workout playlist, a deck of cards; guidebook that included walking tours, and comfort items like a towel and map! I felt like I was the most important guest (surely, everyone felt that way as they checked in to their rooms). Highly recommend to anyone who has the opportunity to travel in the area of an Affinia Hotel!!\n", 1, 1], [651, "knickerbocker", "The Knickerbocker hotel was one of my favorite hotels to visit. My wife and I utilized the park & play package, which gave us an amazing room, complimentary valet service, and a great kit to plan our weekend around. It was well worth the price and we both wish to go back again. The rooms were top notch and the hotel's staff was excellent. One of the employees, Craig, helped us find our way around the city and this shows the Knickerbocker really cares about its guests. We loved our visit and are sure you will too. A+\n", 1, 1], [1614, "hilton", "The stay at the Hilton Chicago definetely felt like a vacation. Sleeping in that big wonderful bed felt like I was at home! The accommodations and hotel are beautiful. I especially enjoyed the gym. The staff was friendly and helpful. I would reccommend this Hotel to anyone who is looking for a home away from home.\n", 1, 1], [1849, "homewood", "My stay at the Hilton was like living in luxury for a few days. I never wanted to go back home much less leave the hotel. During my stay I could work out in their facility and swim at no added charge. In fact, they didn't charge for WIFI, morning breakfast or their grocery shopping service. The lobby always had complimentary coffee, tea, soda and meals! I felt like a queen. This hotel deserves highest marks for service. \n", 1, 1], [1653, "monaco", "Our experience at Hotel Monaco was wonderful. My fiancee and I stayed two nights in the Tranquility suite--absolutely exquisite! We had wonderful room service and practically never had to leave our room. (Except to go to the gym :) I was able to do yoga on the trip because they had yoga accessories in the room! I was surprised by that. This hotel was the definition of 'luxury', they had anything we needed and more. My fiancee said we were staying at a really 'nice' hotel but I had no idea until we walked in the door. As soon as you walk in you are met with the charming atmosphere and luxurious decor. I have to admit, cheesy as it may sound, I felt like a queen all weekend long :) Most of the time I have at least one problem with the hotel I stayed at, but I have to say at this point I have no complaints at all about Hotel Monaco and I will definitely look forward to staying there again during my next trip to Chicago.\n", 1, 1], [560, "hilton", "Me and my wife recently stayed at the Hilton Chicago while on vacation, and I can't recommend it enough. The hotel is located right on Michigan Avenue in downtown Chicago, and right next to tons of great restaurants and stores. The rooms are spacious and elegant; they are modern and stylish without being crazy or garish. I especially liked the big flat screen TV and the very comfy bed, sleeping in hotel rooms is often far from relaxing but I had no problem falling asleep. I highly recommend the Hilton Chicago, I'll definitely stay there again. A+ \n", 1, 1], [1663, "sofitel", "This hotel was gorgeous! I really enjoyed my stay here and will definitely be returning in the future. The staff was friendly, the room was clean, comfortable and very well decorated. The restaurant/ room service was also exceptional. The food was delicious and the room service was prompt. This hotel is also in a great location. It is close to everything anyone may need, such as shopping, food and attractions.\n", 1, 1], [532, "hardrock", " The Hard Rock Hotel Chicago is great alternative to ordinary hotels. The hotel is decorated with a huge variety of music memorabilia that makes the stay worth it alone. The hotel is often visited by many talented artists including singers, dancers,actors etc. The staff were very polite and helpful and always pleasant. The rooms were very clean and nicely decorated, as were the common areas and hallways. I would highly recommend the hotel to anyone staying in the area.\n", 1, 1], [1673, "sofitel", "The Sofitel Water Tower was a wonderful place to stay for my husband and me for our 20th anniversary weekend trip to Chicago. We got married in the city but then moved away, and it was so romantic to return. We loved how near the Sofitel was to everything - the Magnificent Mile was just outside our door, and we could walk to Navy Pier and other attractions as well. Chicago has changed, but the Sofitel made it feel like home again... except a very plush and elegant version of home! We stayed in a Junior Suite, which had great views of the city, and room service was very attentive when we called for champagne after midnight the day we arrived. Both nights before leaving for supper, we had a cocktail in Le Bar and enjoyed talking about what we'd done during the day, and all the great memories this town has for us. But I have to say we have some new great memories now, thanks to the Sofitel Water Tower!\n", 1, 1], [1989, "palmer", "The Palmer House Hilton is located in the heart of the theatre, financial and shopping districts of downtown Chicago. It is walking distance to museums, shopping, government and corporate buildings. The location makes it perfect for visiting Chicago. The rooms are luxurious, with super comfortable beds and soft sheets. The rooms was clean and quite nice looking. The hotel's restaurants are amazing. The hotel would definately exceed your expectations, whether you are a business traveler or there on vacation. \n", 1, 1], [1650, "monaco", "Fantastic stay! The hotel was beautifully decorated and immaculately clean. I chose this place because a friend recommended it plus it was VERY close to my business conference. Here you get the resources and exemplary four star luxury treatment with the downtown Chicago charm. Be sure to try the ribs at South Water Kitchen next door. They are the best I've ever had. EVER! If youre in the mood to unwind, you can sample the evening wine tastings downstairs or take a walk and explore the nightlife all around. I had a great time here. From now on, I won't stay anyplace else. \n", 1, 1], [1746, "talbott", "This is the best hotel to stay in when visiting Chicago. I travel a lot, both for business and vacation. The Talbott Hotel is a cozy yet stately hotel that is handsome, and elegant. Not to mention all the modern features that I'm used to having at home, are available in the room. I brought my wife on my last business trip and we stayed in the one bedroom suite. She didn't even want to leave the room. The concierge was especially helpful in finding us a romantic place to go for dinner. \n", 1, 1], [1725, "hardrock", "I was looking for an unique, hip experience in a hotel that offered the convenient location of downtown Chicago. My choice for hotel was obvious: Hard Rock Hotel Chicago. If you are wondering whether Hard Rock Hotels are schmaltzy or cliche, they are not. Hard Rock Hotel Chicago is modern, trendy and hip. It had an air that this was where musicians came to rock among the 40 stories, and there are details that you won't find elsewhere. For example, one interesting perk is some free iTunes downloads (I got ten) for guests. It's a fun place, hosting events such as Jack Daniel's 160th birthday.\n", 1, 1], [648, "knickerbocker", "I stayed at the Millennium Knickerbocker Hotel for a total of three days, and through out my stay I had a wonderful time. The room was impeccably clean, as well as the pillows and sheets. The beds were large and extremely comfortable. The staff though, in my honest opinion, is what made my stay so pleasant. From the people at the check in, to the waiters at the restaurant, I got the best customer service. The hotel was also conveniently located. It was within walking distance to the shopping center. I would definitely recommend this hotel to anyone staying at around the area in Chicago. \n", 1, 1], [424, "allegro", "During a recent business trip to Chicago I had the pleasure of staying at the Hotel Allegro. The lobby gave a good first impression. It was a very clean with a modern designer's feel and the customer service was great. I proceeded to the counter to check-in and within 5 minutes I had the key to my room. I was told to check out the infamous 312 restaurant but I was tired from my flight. I checked into my room. The room was great. A king size bed 37\" flat screen tv and standard desk all designer furniture. After I unpacked I had to check my email. Hooking up to their Wi-Fi was quick and painless! I had a good night sleep and early wake up the next day for my business meeting. I decided to try the restaurant for breakfast. I had an omelet and fruit. The restaurant was great and the food was perfect. I only wish I had more time to stay and enjoy lunch; nevertheless duty called. The concierge had my taxi waiting for me right after breakfast and I was off to work. I would recommend this hotel to anyone visiting Chicago. It's one of the best I've ever stayed at after multiple business trips.\n", 1, 1], [583, "hyatt", "The Hyatt Regency Chicago is a wonderful hotel. :) Me and my husband recently stayed there on a summer vacation, and it couldn't have been better! The staff was very polite and helpful, and the rooms were very clean, and they had some of the best beds I've ever slept on! Not to mention the view was amazing! If I had to rate this hotel I'd definitely give it five star, next time I'm in town I will most definitely stay there again!\n", 1, 1], [1947, "amalfi", "The Amalfi Hotel in Chicago was by far one of the best experiences I've had. It definitely felt as comfortable as home with the all the luxuriance of a five star establishment. I had forgotten my favorite CD that puts me to sleep each night. When mentioning this in front of the Front desk clerk, she told me that they have a huge collection of CD's available for guests. Low and behold, they had my favorite CD!! Also, my laptop was not cooperating. Come to find out, they offer every guest full access to their amazing and fully functional business center! From now on, when visiting Chicago, I will ONLY be staying at the Amalfi Hotel!\n", 1, 1], [638, "james", "My husband and I stayed at the James Chicago Hotel for our anniversary. This place is fantastic! We knew as soon as we arrived we made the right choice! The rooms are BEAUTIFUL and the staff very attentive and wonderful!! The area of the hotel is great, since I love to shop I couldn't ask for more!! We will definatly be back to Chicago and we will for sure be back to the James Chicago. Betsy M, Louisville, KY \n", 1, 1], [1988, "palmer", "My husband and I snagged a great deal on a weekend trip to Chicago, and decided (at the recommendation of friends) to stay at the Palmer House Hilton. The only word we can use to describe it is \"amazing\"! Walking into the lobby feels like stepping back in time, it is simply breath-taking. Be sure to check out the ceiling, I have never seen one so beautiful outside of Europe. We checked-in without any issues and were assigned a very lovely room with the most comfortable bed I have encountered in any hotel. Everything is in walking distance of the Palmer House, you couldn't hope to find a better location for exploring downtown Chicago. Everything was perfect with our stay here, I would not stay anywhere else in Chicago from now on.\n", 1, 1], [1786, "fairmont", "My husband and I visited the Fairmont Chicago Millennium Park for our honeymoon. The customer service was amazing. From the time we booked our packege to the time we checked in everything was absolutely amazing. These people were proficient, respectful and very thoughtful. The Fairmont had a lounge, a wine room, a bar and a restaurant. I couldn't decide where I wanted to go first! After we put our bags up we headed down to the wine room... It was totally delicious. We also got free wine just because it was our honeymoon! Then after a few glasses of wine we hit the spa, once again excellent!! Everything smells like honeysuckle and everyone smiles all the time. We stayed in the gold room. Although it was a little bit smaller than I thought it would be I was definitely satisfied with the huge king bed with even bigger pillows. My husband and I relaxed in fluffy white bath robes while we sipped champagne while we watched the sparkling lights of the city. It was a wonderful experience that I will never forget. Four thumbs up! \n", 1, 1], [1757, "talbott", "I enjoyed my stay at the Talbott Hotel. It is on the more expensive side, but it is all worth it. I got the Talbott tradition package, which was $245 for two people and included a $30 breakfast credit on check out day. The rooms are huge! The beds are soft and comfortable. They include Aveda bath products, which is a plus in my book. They also have a nice fitness area & pool you can use while you stay there. One thing I thought was really cool is that you can forward your messages from your hotel room phone to your cell phone. My boyfriend also liked the Ihome audio system. The location of this hotel is very convenient as well, its close to several great restaurants and blocks from the coast. But, what I like best about this hotel is that they make an honest effort to not negatively impact the environment more than they need to. They were one of the first hotels to be Green Sealed. Overall I had a great stay at Talbott Hotel!\n", 1, 1], [1954, "amalfi", "I recently stayed at the Amalfi Chicago with my wife on a business trip. We decided to combine business with pleasure and made a long weekend out of our stay after business was concluded. We enjoyed the luxurious in-room spa service and stayed in the superb one bedroom suite with incomparable views of the surrounding city. The individualized attention from check-in to reservations was exceptional and better than what we usually receive from concierge service. The Amalfi actually delivered what they promised and more. Our weekend was more relaxing and enjoyable due to the excellent training of the staff and the amenities offered on site. The hotel's design is modern and sophisticated with the decor being a delight to the senses. Lots of color and clean lines made a great impression and felt both modern and comfortable. Breakfast is served on each floor or in room and my wife especially appreciated the availability of the fresh fruit and yogurt. Being of European descent, I enjoyed the croissants, whole grain muffins, real butter and marmalade. We also brought along our Standard Poodle, Sterling, and the Amalfi is one of the few luxury hotels that allow for pet accommodations and understand that your pet is part of the family. We purchased the pet pamper package and this allowed Sterling to have his days while we had ours and we reunited in the evenings. Sterling slept in our room as usual at the foot of our bed and this contributed to our feeling \"at home\" while away. For pet lovers this is a big plus. Finally, transportation to and from our corporate jet was arranged with ease by the hotel so we did not bring an assistant with us on this trip to handle these arrangements as is normal. This allowed us a bit more privacy and it is scarce for us to be able to do this, another appreciated bonus of our stay. Thank you Amalfi for a superb experience. \n", 1, 1], [431, "allegro", " If you are traveling to Chicago and need a place to stay, I highly recommend the Hotel Allegro Chicago. It was visiting time visiting Chicago for the first time on a business trip and a friend referred me to the Hotel Allegro. He said they were pet friendly,which was a huge plus. This is because I hate leaving my kitten muffin with a pet sitter every time I travel for business. Upon my arrival, I was met with friendly valet who treated me like I was the only customer who mattered. I walked in and saw a hotel like no other I have seen before or after. The lobby was decorated with modern furniture and paintings and looked like a place I could relax in. After I had entered and checked in, I saw the staircase, which looked like a testament to the staircase in the \"Titanic\". Frankly, I was amazed and I had not even entered my room yet. My room was a Queen Deluxe room and it was amazing. The bed had a blue headboard,which I have never seen before, and the colors worked together so well I seriously contemplated living there. The room service was exceptional and promptly brought the food I ordered. Later I wanted to get a drink and I enjoyed it at The Bar 312, which is conveniently located adjacent to the hotel. These are the specifics of my stay, but there is much more to be experienced that I did not mention if you visit the Hotel Allegro. In summary, they allow pets, the service is amazing, the decoration superb, and it is conveniently situated next to dining establishments. What more could a person ask for?\n", 1, 1], [773, "swissotel", "I stayed at this hotel for a weekend and I thought it was really nice. The bed was extremely comfortable and the room was very clean. The room also had a beautiful view. It had everything you could possibly need. I almost didn't want to leave the room. It was definitly worth the price. I would go back. The clientel was also very helpful. \n", 1, 1], [436, "allegro", "I have to admit, I was a little leery about visiting Chicago due to my mild agoraphobia, but after a family member reserved a room at the Hotel Allegro Chicago, my fears were slightly assuaged. A few friends of mine had stayed in this hotel before, and had nothing but positive things to say. With this new-found optimism in mind, I went forward on my journey in confidence. I have to say, I was not let down. From the moment I stepped into the lobby, I felt at home. The concierge called bellboys to move our luggage from the taxi to our rooms, and the check-in process was fast and efficient. The rooms themselves are incredibly homey, feeling less like a hotel room and more like the guest room at a millionaire's mansion. The high comfort level coupled with prompt service when requesting items such as extra pillows and towels, really helped alleviate my apprehensions about staying in Chicago, and provided a secure place to stay at night, or whenever I did not feel like participating with the group. Of course, the rooms are second only to the overall feel of the hotel. I found myself spending less of my downtime in my room and more of it wandering around the building. Overall it's very cozy, and has a certain old-world feeling to it, once again lending to it feeling less like a hotel and more like a mansion at times. It was never overwhelmingly crowded, and the people I did encounter were incredibly friendly, yet not intrusive. I don't usually enjoy staying in hotels, but I love the Allegro Chicago!\n", 1, 1], [625, "james", "We decided to stay at The James last weekend with our kids. We reserved the \"Family Adventurer with Paul Frank\". It's a special offer by the hotel to entice visitors to see the local museums and aquarium. We ended up receiving 2 Chicago City Passes, which ultimately paid for themselves and 4 tickets for the Chicago Children's Museum. My kids had a ball. We ended the day with a milk and cookies turn down service and a special pair of pajamas that my daughter adored. All in all, a great weekend where my kids were the focus. The adults certainly weren't forgotten since we had a great breakfast in the room the next morning. \n", 1, 1], [418, "affinia", "There were many positives when staying in this hotel at the north end of the Magnificant Mile. The rooms were spacious and beautifully appointed with great attention to detail. The quality of service was excellent, the staff professional, and the location was perfect. There are great views of Chicago from many of the rooms. The staff seemed to care about the quality of my stay from the moment I was greeted upon arrival to the moment I got in my taxi to leave. There is a nice rooftop bar/restaurant perfect for a lite meal or a refreshing cocktail with great views of the city. There really weren't any negatives and I would recommend this boutique hotel to anyone staying in the Chicago area.\n", 1, 1], [419, "affinia", "Friendly staff, clean building and rooms. The hotel was located nearby everything we were interested in seeing. Staff was willing to help give directions and very knowledgable of city. Rooms were beautifully designed and well lit, spacious and comfortable. \n", 1, 1], [699, "omni", "Luxury and comfort combine to give a wonderful sense of relaxation for guests at the Omni Chicago Hotel. Their rooms are some of the cleanest and most well-furnished I have ever seen at a four-diamond hotel, and the 676 Lounge, which has accommodating late hours, was perfect for me to relax after a day of work. The workout room is absolutely HUGE, and each treadmill has its own TV to watch while working out - fantastic! Overall, my experience at the Omni was amazing. I'll definitely be coming back the next time I'm in Chicago!\n", 1, 1], [1946, "amalfi", "Amalfi Hotel Chicago is just minutes from Navy Pier, Michigan Avenue, the Chicago Opera Theater, The House of Blues, and the hottest night clubs. At $200.00 per night, you can expect the very best from your staff, and your accomodations. When I arrived for my weekend stay, I was greeted by a pleasant surprise of wall art, and eclectic style. After reaching my room, I was able to relax in peace on the numerous pillows. I didn't choose to use the spa this trip, but when I come back, it will be the first item on my list! The business office was great, because I had a last minute emergency with work- thank goodness for cocktail hour. Breakfast was delicious. I have already told a friend from Naperville that the next time I'm in town, she'll have to stay at Amalfi with me, instead of commuting. She really missed out! -Atlanta Girl-\n", 1, 1], [1620, "hilton", "Me and my wife recently stayed at the Hilton Chicago while on vacation, and I can't recommend it enough. The hotel is located right on Michigan Avenue in downtown Chicago, and right next to tons of great restaurants and stores. The rooms are spacious and elegant; they are modern and stylish without being crazy or garish. I especially liked the big flat screen TV and the very comfy bed, sleeping in hotel rooms is often far from relaxing but I had no problem falling asleep. I highly recommend the Hilton Chicago, I'll definitely stay there again. A+ \n", 1, 1], [1955, "amalfi", "My fiance and I had taken a trip to Chicago and wanted to stay someplace close to Downtown, so he chose the Amalfi Hotel, located conveniently to everything we needed. This place was phenomenal!!! He chose a romantic getaway package, as we were only in town for a few days and it was the best choice ever. The hotel is super clean and very chic; the beds are so comfortable and the staff is superb. We were able to bring along our dog, which was also really important to us. The first day we were there, we had gone out during the day with our dog and came back to an in-room couple's massage. The masseuses come straight to your room so it's really relaxing and stress-relieving and they were great. After our massages, we went to the Keefer Steakhouse, which the hotel gave us a gift certificate for and the food was fantastic. They do also have a great continental breakfast and we did also eat at the Rocket grill, which was nice as well. In all, our 3 nights there were pretty similar, we went out during the day and had a great time at the hotel while we were there; I've recommended this place to a few of my clients going to the Windy City.\n", 1, 1], [1602, "hilton", "The Hilton Chicago was amazing!! It is close to almost everything that Chicago has to offer! We could walk to Lake Michigan, Grant Park, Niketown, Watertower place, etc. The rooms were very nice and refreshed every day. Also, they allow pets!! You don't have to go far to get good food because they have a few different restaurants right there! Overall experience was an A++.\n", 1, 1], [607, "intercontinental", "The InterContinental hotel is truly a hidden treasure. Nestled deep in sky scraping steel epicenter of downtown Chicago, the hotel is a taste of both modern day luxury and old time charm. From the tiled indoor pool surrounded by high Romanesque arching ceilings to the rich mahogany furniture and lace curtains in the suites, the InterContinental was built to satisfy the taste of even the most hardened traveler. Book well in advance as it is one of the most sought after retreats in all of Chicago.\n", 1, 1], [1970, "intercontinental", " We just returned from a relaxing stay at the InterContinental in Chicago. I have to say the service was phenomenal! From the maid to the concierge and everyone in between, the staff treated us like royalty. It was quite the treat to feel so special. Our room was gorgeous. The view of the city was breathtaking. The luxury mattress and bedding made for the most comfortable peaceful slumber. We found the marble bathroom stunning and impeccably clean. My wife was very pleased with the lighted make-up mirror while I enjoyed the reliable Wi-Fi connection. During our stay we dinned in the Zest. Wow! They offer an extensive wine menu and a full array of gourmet food options. We had to try the famous wiener schnitzel -- it was scrumptious. Afterwards, my wife and I shared the chocolate lava cake, can I just say oh that cake is to die for! Really the best we ever had. In the morning we spent some time working off dinner at the junior olympic swimming pool; followed by an exhilarating round of cardio in the hotels dedicated cardio room. Afterwards, a trip to the sauna was a well deserved refuge. Overall, our stay at the InterContinental in Chicago was nothing short of fabulous. This luxury hotel is complete with the finest of amenities and the most caring staff. We are looking forward to staying at the InterContinental again, hopeful soon! \n", 1, 1], [647, "knickerbocker", "I wouldn't know how to begin to write something negative about the Millenium Knickerbocker Hotel in Chicago. Everything about this hotel is fantastic from the outside of the building to the hotel lobby all the way to the rooms. With very clean and plush rooms, this is the place to stay! When you are not at the hotel eating at the elegant dining area or having a great breakfast first thing in the morning, there is plenty to do around the town. Take a shopping spree down Michigan Ave or head to one of the museums or the pier to look around. Whatever you decide to do, you can't go wrong. This place is wonderful!\n", 1, 1], [1747, "talbott", "My stay at the Talbott was a wonderful experience. The service at this upscale hotel was beyond my expectations, the Gold Coast location is close to Michigan Ave, the museums, and many of the other sites Chicago has to offer.If you are visiting Chicago, I highly recommend the Talbott!\n", 1, 1], [502, "fairmont", "The Fairmont Chicago Millenium Park Hotel provides a rich, beautiful, cultured atmosphere. During my stay, I felt like royalty. With unparalleled design schemes and beautiful, tranquil views, the mood during my entire stay was one of bliss. The guest services department was second-to-none. The staff throughout the hotel were obviously concerned with pleasing the customer and making my stay as wonderful as possible. When dealing with a staff member at Fairmont, I felt as if I were the only guest in the place. The food and drink selections were vast and fit for a king. I will definitely recommend Fairmont Chicago Millenium Park to my friends and colleagues. I will also greatly look forward to my next stay.\n", 1, 1], [1659, "monaco", "My stay at the Hotel Monaco recently was fantastic. We got a very reasonable price for our stay (especially since we were a AAA member), and there was plenty of perks to utilize; in-room spa treatments and an evening wine wine hour to name a few. Another thing that the kids really enjoyed was that, upon request, the staff brought us a fish in its own fishbowl for our room. How cool is that! The staff were all very helpful and friendly and our stay was very enjoyable. I would definitely recommend the Hotel Monaco to anyone in the downtown Chicago area. \n", 1, 1], [1607, "hilton", "My husband and I stayed in the Hilton Chicago and had a very nice stay! The rooms were large and comfortable. The view of Lake Michigan from our room was gorgeous. Room service was really good and quick,eating in the room looking at that view, awesome! The pool was really nice but we didnt get a chance to use it. Great location for all of the downtown Chicago attractions such as theaters and museums. Very friendly staff and knowledgable, you cant go wrong staying here. \n", 1, 1], [494, "conrad", "My wife and I checked in to this hotel after a rough flight from Los Angeles. We decided to treat ourselves to a nice hotel while visiting our recently graduated son, and we were not disappointed. The location could not have been better, as we were afforded easy access to Chicago's culture and shopping by being just off Michigan Avenue. After a long day of exploring the city, we enjoyed a fantastic dinner on the terrace overlooking the city. The halibut was cooked just right, and our waiter made us feel very welcome with some friendly conversation. Overall, I would recommend this hotel to anyone traveling in Chicago! \n", 1, 1], [783, "talbott", "The Talbott Hotel is fantastic! I stayed there on business and found that it met my every need. The high speed internet access worked flawlessly; allowed me to do much of my work from the comfort of my luxuriously appointed room. I really like to exercise before a day of meetings; access to the fitness club next door was very convenient. Last point: I work for a green consulting firm out of L.A. and the hotel's environmental credentials dovetailed perfectly with our mission. Guilt free luxury!\n", 1, 1], [1780, "conrad", "I went to stay at this hotel last year. I have got to say it was a great authentic experience, the dining Restaurant was clean and fantastic the rooms were very comfortable with a friendly staff. Its location couldn't be more perfect so close you can walk to do some shopping. Looking at it from the outside at night is very beautiful. It is very affordable. I recommend this place to anyone and plan on staying again the next time i come to town.\n", 1, 1], [1996, "palmer", "The Palmer House Hilton hotel takes luxury to a whole new level of existence. The rooms are beautifully decorated, with class and superior quality furniture. The hotels restaurant \"lockwood\" consist's of delicious French and Italian cuisine. The location is in the prime area to downtown, and shopping areas. This hotel is suited for pristine guests, and those who are not willing to settle for less. If you're looking for not just any stay, but a stay in luxury, you should give The Palmer House Hilton a try. It is one of the best of the best in Chicago, and your stay will be one to remember.\n", 1, 1], [570, "homewood", "Upon entering Homewood Suites, I was greeted by incredibly friendly staff and my breath was taken by the beauty of the hotel. When I saw my room, I was immediately relieved because it provided all of the amenities needed for my week-long business stay (refrigerator, microwave, stove, dishwasher, flat panel TV). Best of all, the hotel has an on-site fitness center where I was able to work off all of the extra calories I consumed during the delicious complimentary breakfast. I couldn't resist their omelettes! The hotel is in the heart of Chicago and I must say, the city view from my room was priceless. Definitely recommended! \n", 1, 1], [1922, "allegro", "When I had to visit Chicago for business I asked some of my associates where to stay and several of them recommended the Hotel Allegro. After my stay I can honestly say that I agree. From the luxurious bedding to the technological amenities, everything was thought of. The only place I find more comfortable then this hotel is my actual home. I now know where I will be staying every time I have business in this city, and anyone I know who is doing the same will hear so.\n", 1, 1], [1628, "james", "This was really an unexpected experience for me as far as hotel accommodations go. For this week's vacation in Chicago, I heard several recommendations regarding lodging, but the James Chicago was mentioned most emphatically. I expected an experience of comfort, luxury and customer satisfaction, but I was pleasantly surprised by the level of innovation and forward-thinking employed by every aspect of this hotel. The design is breathtaking -- modern, clean, stylish, sexy -- and its reflected everywhere from the lobby, shops and restaurants, to the stunning guest rooms themselves. My family and I felt energized by the smartly sleek environment we were in, and were impressed at every turn by the sophisticated take on hotel decor. Far from a traditional hotel experience, this was like moving into chic, exclusive downtown apartment, and truly an upscale adventure in modern luxury living. Impressive, too, was the hotel's overall approach to its guests and its use of the world's resources. From its offer of in-room recycling to the available bicycles for guest usage, the James offers a unique perspective on its place in the world, and gently helps its guests assist in maintaining that balance with ease and elegance. It's a respect that shows through, too, in other areas: support for artistic organizations, charities and other programs of merit, as well as Chicago-centric packages compiled for guests so they can make the best of their stay, whether for a weekend, a week, or longer. The James Chicago will definitely be our choice for accommodations whenever we revisit Chicago. In fact, we may visit again solely to stay at the James! \n", 1, 1], [1897, "sheraton", "My husband and I loved this hotel. The staff were friendly, the food on the room service menu was a reasonable price, and we got an extra (free) coffeepot in our room immediately when we asked for it. Highly recommended!\n", 1, 1], [1654, "monaco", "My stay at the Hotel Monaco Chicago was amazing. The staff are polite and well poised, eager to give a helping hand in a short notice. To someone like me, who had never even been in the city of Chicago, it really gave me a good feeling throughout my whole trip. The rooms, hallways and facilities were exceptionally clean and tidy, and whenver I went out, I would always find my room perfect ; be it for a night of undwinding after one of my conferences, or just to hit the mattress and sleep. During my stay, I stopped at their restuarant where I had one of the best American style meal in a while. Overall, the Hotel Monaco is a place I would surely stay at again if given the chance to visit Chicago for a second time. It is truely exceptional.\n", 1, 1], [1783, "fairmont", "Fantastic Hotel! Upscale and luxurious, and in a great location! Rooms are spacious and comfortable and the staff goes out of their way to treat guests like royalty! The rooms are tastefully decorated and very clean, the beds are comfortable and even the bathrooms were to die for! My husband and I had a great time in the lounge and enjoyed many of the amenities. I would definitely recommend this hotel to everyone, and can't wait to get back there myself!\n", 1, 1], [624, "james", "I stayed in on of The James one bedroom apartments for two weeks while in Chicago visiting my daughter. The pre-arrival assistant was incredibly helpful in acquiring some necessities I forgot to pack and left them in my room for me. Later in the week I treated myself to an Asha Massage from their lengthy list of delicious spa services. Afterward I smelled wonderful and was the most relaxed I'd been in years. My room was clean and modern, yet warm and comforting with dark wood tones and lush bedding. I'll certainly be staying with them again in the future. \n", 1, 1], [765, "swissotel", "Everything you would would expect from a top-notch hotel and exceeded by the service. The trendy decor and easy to access dining gave us a 'second-wind' pick up after a day of sight-seeing. This hotel is definitely the place that I want to come back to. By the time we left after 4 days and 3 nights, my wife and I wished we had more time to enjoy the restaurant a few more times and the delightful Swiss flare. One of the things we enjoyed the most was seeing the water from our window. The feeling of being pampered can only come from the very gracious hotel staff and this hotel is number 1 in my mind. \n", 1, 1], [727, "sheraton", "Thanks Sheraton Towers for the invite to enjoy your indoor pool while a guest at your hotel recently. I did not know that the skyline of Chicago could be so beautiful or an afternoon at the pool so enjoyable. I'll be back soon and look forward to a seeing Chicago again.\n", 1, 1], [1945, "amalfi", "I was visiting Chicago for a christening with my fiance. I was impressed with this hotel from the moment I checked in. The lobby was exceptionally modern with color and furnishings. Front desk staff was pleasant and helpful, especially Susan, who quickly suggested and reserved a table for us at Keefer's Steakhouse for a late dinner. The room itself was fabulous. Extremely comfortable King sized bed, dual head shower, breathtakingly beautiful views of the city, I couldn't ask for more. After a great nights sleep we awoke to a great FREE breakfast right outside our room! Next we enjoyed a couple's massage and I was treated to a facial as my fiance took a short run through the city. After a day full of shopping we retired to our room and ordered room service that was on time and delicious. Unfortunately we checked out the next day, because I could have stayed there forever. I fully recommend the Amalfi Hotel Chicago for everyone interested in a superior stay. It is truly a beautiful and well appointed hotel.\n", 1, 1], [1906, "swissotel", "Staying at the Swissotel in downtown Chicago is not so much the typical stay so much as it is an experience. Not only is the hotel located in a great area to get to all local attractions, but while you are at the hotel you will have many amazing accommodations at your disposal. There are two gourmet on site restaurants and a lounge to relax and get great food. The rooms are over sized and the beds are among the most comfortable you will ever find. Finally, the service is award winning so anything that you do not already have at the Swissotel will be at your fingertips with their assistance. Overall I would highly recommend this hotel to anyone who is looking for more than the typical hotel.\n", 1, 1], [717, "palmer", "We really enjoyed our stay at the Palmer House Hilton. We were in Chicago for a weekend stay, and wanted something close to State Street, and convenient to the theatre district and the museums, and Michigan Ave. shopping. This is a grand old hotel, with just about every amenity one could wish for. The lobby is fabulous, and the hotel also has some nice restaurants . Our room had a nice king sized bed, and was pretty cozy. Hotel employees were very nice and helpful to us. I would definitely recommend this hotel if you want a \"grand hotel\" type experience at a reasonable price for the many amenities and in a very convenient spot in downtown Chicago. You will definitely feel special.\n", 1, 1], [1727, "hardrock", "I traveled to Chicago recently with my giant German Shepard dog Rex and picked the Hard Rock Hotel for the perfect location and because a close friend had warmly recommended their pet friendliness. The service truly is incredible. They even had a web-cam so I could check in on Rex while I was out for dinner in the evening and a friendly staff member took him for a walk when I could not make it home from a meeting the day after. The rooms really rock (pardon the pun). Nothing like the cheap plastic laminated stained carpet decor so common in other places that allow pets. The easy chair looked so good that I was almost afraid Rex would snack on it while I was out, but he seemed to like the guitar chew-toy that came with the pet package better. I would definitely recommend the Hard Rock Hotel to my friends - whether they travel with or without pets. \n", 1, 1], [1202, "affinia", "We've just returned from a two night stay at the Affinia Chicago and our visit was delightful. Thanks to tripadvisor reviews we were prepared for the major construction work on the facade and entrance..it was a mess. And the hotel restaurant and bar remain incomplete and unavailable. Even parts of the lobby had \"wet paint\" stickers. All these things could have made for a disappointing stay. Not so!! Although we arrived very early in the day our suite was ready along with a most warm and gracious greeting from the front desk staff. After just a few minutes we felt like we were \"at home.\" The suite on the 25th floor, with a fab view along a wall of windows, was sparkling fresh and clean. The bathroom lighting was outstanding and led to my bride of nearly 50 years saying that it made her look younger...she was right! Everything in and about the room was \"like-new\" and very stylish. As a visitor we appreciated the very convenient location just a few steps from the Magnificient Mile and all of its ambiance. Thanks to a dedicated and gracious staff, a fantastic location, and chic decorating elements, this hotel can and will be our future hotel of choice in Chicago. The stay was short..but sweet. \n", 1, 0], [1417, "intercontinental", "Stayed here for two days while attending Lollopalooza music festival. One of the best locations in Chicago, on Michigan Ave near the Tribune and Sun-Times buildings. An easy walk or bus ride to many attractions. The King sized room was very nice, not large, but with a generous bathroom. Service was excellent throughout. Check out the awesome swimming pool, straight out of twenties. \n", 1, 0], [1325, "hardrock", "The Hard Rock hotel is great for a relaxing getaway. The rooms are quiet, the bed is comfortable and the bathroom is a nice size. We had fabulous service and got a great rate. Other than the fact that there were no bathrobes (it's listed as an amenity) and the Sony radio didn't work, it was perfect. Would definitely stay there again! \n", 1, 0], [1311, "fairmont", "Simply a nice place to stay... I had a great deal for the room, and was impressed with the quality. Hotel staff was very helpful; they were able to let me check out and helped me print boarding passes. Negative: It is frustrating that nowadays you do not have free internet in most hotels and it's the same here; you have to pay for the internet. Negative: Loud on the phone you may hear your neighbors on the phone, or them shower. \n", 1, 0], [1351, "hilton", "My stay was quick but awesome. After a long day, seeing a substantial line at check-in was a bit of a groaner, but then i saw the self-serve kiosks. i was checked in with keys in hand in under 3 minutes. in the morning i was able to check out on the TV in my room. the hotel is a beautiful historic landmark with all the amenities of a modern hotel and all the charm of its 1927 origins. The bed was FABULOUSLY comfortable. i wish i could live there. they have many rooms wtih 2 bathrooms. i stayed in a room like that once with a friend and we didn't know ahead of time that we had two bathrooms. talk about squeals of delight. that was about 7 years ago in virginia beach. i was by myself at the hilton and had no need for a room with two bathrooms, but it's the first time i've seen this since. what a great feature! \n", 1, 0], [1379, "homewood", "This hotel was very beautiful. I went with a group of 4 friends and we had a blast. It was very centrally located and was close to all sorts of transportation. The Continental breakfast was magnificent! I didn't see much of the staff but all of the men at the front door were extremely helpful. \n", 1, 0], [1232, "allegro", "I stayed here for 2 nights in May 2008. I have to say the hotel was exceptionally clean and very modern and funky. They had a free wine tasting each evening! The restaurant served very good breakfasts and the staff were lovely and helpful throughout the stay. The hotel is located within walking distance to the metro system and also close to shopping / restaurants and sights! Rooms were lovely, althou the bathroom was slightly on the compact side. Will be back. \n", 1, 0], [1233, "allegro", "Booked via Priceline.com for a weekend getaway and got the room for $75 per night. When we arrived via Midway we took the Orange Line to within a block of the hotel for just $2. Hotel easy to find. Never felt uncomfortable with the neighborhood/area. Saw very few homeless or panhandlers. Walked all over the place. Great location and hotel is about a $5-$6 cab ride from most major attractions/shopping/restaurants. Hotel is almost gawdy with colors/decor, but it's not that different from a cruise ship decor. It was not annoying decor by any means. Check in was painless and the service was great! Heard NO noise whatsoever...the reports of \"thin walls\" are greatly exaggerated. The walls are all concrete and thick...we heard NOTHING both nights we were there! Highly recommend this hotel! Rooms are small but not crowded for two people...they are old style hotel rooms..very classic \n", 1, 0], [1357, "hilton", "I only stayed out with my boyfriend for one night, however enjoyed my stay. The staff was friendly, the room was nice and clean, the hallways and ballrooms etc were elegant. Room service was quick and had good options to choose from that actually tasted great. The staff was able to extend our check out time for an extra 1-2 hours without an extra charge to the room. Great location too! Walking distance from the Art Museum, Millennium Park, Grant Park (right across the street) and a quick cab ride to McCormick Place. If I were in the city again I would love to stay there again. \n", 1, 0], [1281, "conrad", "I just left the Conrad Chicago and have nothing but good things to say. We used Hilton points to stay there but paid $35/night to upgrade to a junior suite. We were in room 1519. I would reccomend people ask for an odd numbered room so that they will have a view looking north on Michigan Ave. Our room was very modern with 2 large HD/flat panel tv and Bose 3 speaker sound system. 4 big windows that actually open. The bed lineds were very nice, the towels were OK. The room was clean and the bath room had a seperate shower and tub. Marble everywhere. Robes, slippers, etc. The work out room was good with different machines and some free weights. There are clean towels in the workout room too. We never ate in the hotel so I can't comment on the food or the prices. There is a Starbucks across the street (Michigan) and an Espresso bar attached to the Nordstrom that is on the ground floor of the hotel. It was very nice to have the little mall right under the hotel. The location of the hotel could not be better. We were walking distance to everything. Every kind of shopping or dinning experience you could possibly want was within 2 miles. Over all the hotel had a boutique feel to it even though it is part of the hilton chain. \n", 1, 0], [1580, "swissotel", "I recently stayed at this hotel with my family (10-1 / 10-3). We had a terrific experience. I landed the hotel through Priceline for $80 per night and paid an additional $75 per night for a suite on the 41st floor. My two young boys loved it as the view was unbelieveable and the pool on the 42nd floor was easily accessible. I found all the employees that we interfaced with to be very friendly and accommodating. I would love to stay here again. \n", 1, 0], [1309, "fairmont", "From the moment I stepped up to the front entrance my luxury service began! I enjoyed every minute @ the fairmont! The King room was spacious and the decor chic! The coffee maker was the coolest and the bathroom is huge! I really like the separate shower, tub, and separate door for the toilet. The desserts and cheese spread at ENO so yummy. Before the fairmont the W hotel was my favorite chain of hotels to stay at. \n", 1, 0], [1531, "sheraton", "I stayed for just one nite at the Sheraton Hotel and Towers and was a little nervous after reading a few negative reviews from other TA posters but I was not let down. I got the room via PL @ $70 and was first placed in a room on the 8th floor with a fabulous view of the roof of the lobby and a parking lot. Since I had nothing to lose, I asked to be moved to a \"room with a view\". The front desk attendant( Rasheeda) wanted to make sure that the room I had at first was clean and was in order and I assured her that it was. She then moved me up to the 24th floor with ease and it took about 1 minute. I was quite surprised as I have heard that they treat PL and Hotwire folks with a little less love than full price customers. The new room was very clean and spacious and overlooked the Navy Pier, a few other skyrise condos and the beautiful infinity of Lake Michigan. All this for $70? Yep! I skipped room service and walked to the local gourmet market as suggested by others and it was pricey but all food there was delicious! The room was comfy, had an ample closet and room to breathe as well as a convenient internet connection location. I didnt use it since I wasnt staying that long but at least it was on the desk. The bed and pillows were very comfy, but I awoke at about 330 in the morning sweating from the comfy but VERY WARM and somewhat weighty duvet on the bed. This was a great deal for the price and I would absolutely stay here again. \n", 1, 0], [1428, "james", "We have just returned from a week at the James Chicago. The hotel is fabulous, very chic and chilled. The service is beyond compare. Check in and out were swift and painless. The Concierge service is also super efficient having located an excellent hair salon and a couple of fab restaurants for us during our stay. The hotel restaurant itself is rated 5 in the top 10 in Chicago - voted by Chicago residents. We stayed on the 14th floor with great views of the city. The room (a deluxe king) was equipped with a great selection of cocktail making lovelies, hairdryer, safe, tv, robes & slippers, a very interesting selection of minibar items (one of which was a real surprise!) including crisps/snacks a first aid kit and an umbrella! We also had a spotless and elegant bathroom with Kiehls products and a cosy little dining area. The ipod dock/CD/radio and complimentary chillout CD were a nice touch and husband liked the enormous plasma tv. The super comfy bed ensured a good snooze and complimentary WiFi allowed us to plan our next day's activities from our bedroom. We were so busy touring around the city we didn't get an opportunity to use the gym or the spa - both of which looked fab. The bar/lobby area is a haven of civilised tranquility with smooth music playing in the background to help you chillout that bit more. Staff are attentive without being fussy and a good selection of drinks and bar snacks are available. The barman mixes a mean mohito ! This hotel is full of nice little thoughtful touches to make people feel welcomed and cared for e.g. The Virtual Tuck In service - basically a couple of PCs with webcams to allow people to say goodnight to their children when they're away from home on business. Also the dog biscuits and water outside the front door for our furry friends. Next visit to Chicago I'll definitely be staying here and wouldn't even consider an alternative if The James can maintain these standards. \n", 1, 0], [1405, "intercontinental", "I stayed at the hotel one night. The hotel is excellent, comparable quality than Marriott and Sheraton, perhaps superior, but the location is definitely much better. Whatever your trip purpose is, business or leisure, you can drop your bags and take a walk on the Magnificent mile. Loved it! \n", 1, 0], [1283, "conrad", "We have just returned from 4 nights at the Conrad Chicago, everthing about the hotel was excellent. Wonderful room and service from all the staff was first class. Great view from our room. The hotels location is great, right in the centre of the magnificent mile. A wonderful stay in an amazing city was made perfect by our stay at the Conrad. \n", 1, 0], [1241, "amalfi", "This hotel cannot be beat for location, price, & atmosphere. The location is ideal, at the corner of State & Kinzie. There are fantastic restaurants & bars all around, including House of Blues & Harry Caray's. We stayed in a \"Corner King\" room. The room was amazing. Two of the four walls are floor to ceiling windows. Even just being on the 5th floor, we had great views of the surrounding area. The decor and amenities are unmatched. The decor is very clean & simple but luxurious. The hotel is easy to miss from street level, but shouldn't be. The staff were extremely friendly and accommodating. Its a perfect home base if your plans revolve around River North, State Street shopping, or Clark Street nightlife. Even if you'll be on the Mag Mile, this is a short cab ride away. We've officially named this our downtown hotel of choice! \n", 1, 0], [1481, "omni", "We stayed at the Omni between Christmas and New Year's in 2008 just to get away for a few days. We found it through web deals and got a penthouse suite very cheap. So this year we checked online just a day or so after Christmas and the deal was there again. It also included parking at the great price. Huge suite overlooking downtown Chicago. Best location to walk EVERYWHERE. My 12 and 11 yr olds loved swimming at night and the chocolate cookies on their pillows. Can't wait to go back. \n", 1, 0], [1504, "palmer", "Just returned from a week in Chicago with the family. This hotel was perfect for us. Location is great, kids loved the pool as a place to wind down after a day of museums, touring, ball games, etc. We checked in through Hilton Honors Desk as opposed to the regular check in line. Even though our reservations were through priceline at a reduced rate, they gave us a pick of the the rooms. The room had a large closet which helped with the amount of gear we had with us. Used valet parking which was hasselfree. We had a great experience and would stay there again. \n", 1, 0], [1483, "omni", "I stayed at the Omni for one night following a business meeting at another downtown Chicago hotel. I was completely impressed by the service; all personnel during my stay were absolutely outstanding. I checked in quite early (no problem) and was efficiently checked in. My room had a somewhat heavy scent of air freshener (the ONLY negative from the entire stay), which was managed reasonably well by opening the windows. I don't generally require much during my hotel stays, but suffice to say the doorman, housekeeping, the night manager and bartender at 676, the day waiter at 676, and the concierge were amazing - I never waited more than about 30 seconds for anything. The room was very comfy and the amenities were superior. One very tiny complaint - there was no wastebasket near the sink or near the wet bar - had to walk to the other end of the bathroom or sitting room to dispose of kleenex/coffee paraphernalia. One wastebasket would make all the difference. All that said - what a great hotel!! Thanks, Omni - I had a great stay! \n", 1, 0], [1598, "talbott", "My husband attended a conference in Chicago for the weekend of June 22nd and I decided to tag along for the shopping! We flew into O'Hare and took a cab to the hotel, cost about $30. Everybody from the doorman to reception desk to concierge were extremely friendly and helpful. We had a room on the 9th floor which overlooked the construction, but we were hardly in the room so it didn't bother us. We were also never awakened due to construction noise and my husband is a very light sleeper. The room was clean and spacious enough for us. The bed is very comfy. We ate in the restaurant downstairs several times for breakfast and lunch and all meals were great. The location of this hotel is perfect. You are about 1&1/2 blocks from Michigan Ave and the Hancock tower. Can't beat that! There is also an adorable pet store called Tails In The City across from the hotel! I brought our dog back a couple of toys! They are very nice as well. All in all, no complaints. The hotel is clean and beyond what we were expecting. The staff is always friendly and the location is superb. It's a safe neighborhood-I walked around by myself and felt fine. We would definitely return. \n", 1, 0], [1487, "omni", "At the last minute, my son and I decided to take a quick trip to Chicago to see the Cubs. After checking Priceline I decided to book the Omni because of the great price for airfare and hotel. We arrived at the hotel around noon and our room was ready(I had called ahead and requested early arrival).The front desk treated us like we were there best customers-very friendly and accomodating. The room was wonderful with all the modern conviences you would expect in an upscale hotel. The room was spotless and the bed was VERY comfortable. There was not one sign of bed bugs as mentioned in a previous review-maybe those bed bugs were from their luggage and were transferred into their room!!!We then went to the hotel restaurant and had lunch. Our service was great as was the food. We also tried several restaurants around the Omni-all within walking distance. The service, cleanliness and location of the Omni were incredible. We will definitely go back. \n", 1, 0], [1536, "sheraton", "My daughter and I were in Chicago for one night after having attended a three-day conference elsewhere in Illinois. We were only in Chicago on our way home. We didn't know where to stay in Chicago, but booked one night at the Sheraton Chicago Hotel and Towers based on their ad in the Chicago Visitors Guide. We're glad we did! We enjoyed our stay very much. Our room was very comfortable and well appointed and had a wonderful view of the city. That's what we wanted--a great view, and we got it. Also, the hotel is within walking distance of many attractions and is accessible from the bus stop (we took the train and bus from the airport into the city and it wasn't bad--saved us a lot of money). The elevators to our room were fast and quick and there was one always available. We found the front desk staff to be friendly and accommodating. The only downside for us is that we had only booked one night in Chicago. We wish we could have stayed there at the Sheraton for at least another night. We would definitely stay there again. \n", 1, 0], [1526, "sheraton", "The sheraton was a wonderful hotel! When me and my mom flew in we were really tired so we decided to take a quick nap. We didnt want to get up! The beds are absolutely to die for. I wanted to take it home with me. The service was great and this was probably one of the biggest if not the biggest hotel ive ever stayed in. They had a really nice restaurant inside with excellent food. \n", 1, 0], [1231, "allegro", "We have stayed here several times and have always found it to be clean with comfortable beds. We were given a choice of breakfast or free cocktails which we thought was a nice touch. Our room was small but adequate. Location was great, close to the L trains and also close to the train station as we always \"walk\" from Union Station. \n", 1, 0], [1505, "palmer", "My wife and I stayed for 2 nights and loved it. Our stay was booked for us by Virgin Atlantic when we booked our flights from London to Chicago. We were not quite sure what to expect but were reassured by the Hilton brand name. In the event we found that the airline knew what they were doing when they suggested this hotel. On arrrival we got a warm welcome and the check in was quick and efficient. The interior of the hotel is spectacular and looks like has been refurbished to reflect the decor as it would have been when it was built. The room we were given was a good size with 1 Queen bed which was particularly comfortable. The hotel is conveniently located with restaurants nearby. The first night we ate at the hotel's own gourmet restaurant (The Lockwood) which did not disappoint. The breakfasts are also served in this restaurant. We had the buffet both mornings and these were good value for the quality offered. Generally we found the service in this hotel good and the staff very helpful. A nice touch was that when we checked out of the hotel to go to our next destination the car we had booked to pick us up was a few minutes late arriving. A member of staff supervising the doormen saw us looking a bit lost and came over to assist us find the car when it did arrive. Overall I would thoroughly recommend this hotel for both business and leisure stays for both quality and value for money. \n", 1, 0], [1291, "conrad", "We usually stay at the Sofitel but thought we would try the Conrad for a change. I don't think I would rate this hotel over the Sofitel but it was still 1st class. But I do think the service was better at the Conrad. We arrived at the hotel just before the restaurant closed and soon we were the only table left. Normally service goes down hill then but our waiter Eric was the best. Even when I kept ordering my after dinner ports. The meal may not have been The Chop House but it was still very good. The bar was ok, no Crown Reserve. They did have the Cask 16 at $24 a drink, ouch. The room service was very quick. Our room was very clean and the maids replace everything including the ashtrays during their visits. The only fault we could find was the temperature on the 14th floor. It was so hot that we had our window open the whole time with the heat turned completely off. Which wasn't so bad since my wife smokes. The temp on the 5th where the lobby, bar, and restaurant was fine. We enjoyed the hotel enough that we will be back in Sept. One last thing, if you like a cheap fantastic breakfast. Go to the West Egg, only a few blocks away. \n", 1, 0], [1408, "intercontinental", "The hotel is beautiful. It is an excellent location. There was a few minor issues. The hotel is clearly geared toward the convention and business crowd. There were charges for almost everything, although I did not incur any of these. Our room was a little small for the class of hotel, but not overwhelmingly small. Not a true complaint, but the elevators were very slow. My comparison was that we stayed in an equally aged hotel in a different city during our trip, and the Intercontinental's were significantly slower. That's it, no more little nit picks. The staff was excellent, the doormen being the highlight. The hotel bar was also very nice. The hotel was immaculately clean. I would definitely travel to this hotel again. \n", 1, 0], [1323, "hardrock", "Just putting in a good word for the Hard Rock Hotel in Chicago. The reviews I read before going were mixed so we were not sure what to expect. The location was perfect. The hotel was beautiful. Our view was awesome. The room was large enough and very clean. The bed was very comfy. The staff were helpful - especially the concierge, Jared. I couldn't find anything negative to say. If you want to stay in downtown Chicago - you can't go wrong with this cool hotel. \n", 1, 0], [1248, "amalfi", "This hotel was great - In a great area right downtown and close to everything. The daily happy hour had great food, wine and premium liquors. The free breakfast was even better! Actually I believe everything was included breakfast/happy hour/business center/WiFi. Our room was a king size facing the back of the building. Really clean new and comfortable. Small touches such as books and cds to enjoy made the room feel less like a hotel - Would highly recommend. \n", 1, 0], [1582, "talbott", "My girlfriends and I stayed 4 nights at the Talbott returning home on Saturday 9/29. We all had a wonderful time and thoroughly enjoyed the hotel. The staff from top to bottom were excellent, accommodating. The room was roomy...with our only complaint being not being able to cool the room fast enough after a day on the town. The construction next door was obstructing the sidewalk, but being on a oneway street limited that difficulty. The doorman, Andrew was an excellent source at this hotel. He arranged all our transportation at night to restaurants. We enjoyed everything about the hotel and the city. The hotel was expensive but met expectations. \n", 1, 0], [1492, "omni", "I stayed at the Omni with a Band that what in town. The room was amazing. Just walking in, the hotel was gorgeous. I have no complaints. Prompt Room service, Friendly front desk. Many shops, beautiful fountin. Just an all around great hotel in a great City. \n", 1, 0], [268, "monaco", "Eww! What a sickening affair; the Hotel Monaco Chicago is a stuffy masterpiece of a hotel done wrong. I stayed there recently and the rooms reek of the pretended elite classes whom fill its rooms. I seriously was afraid to even lie between the sheets for fear of being charged a hefty linens fee... I stayed in Chicago for a week; I stayed at the Hotel Monaco for one night!\n", -1, 1], [266, "monaco", "I arrived to find that my room was not ready, despite it being past the 3pm check in time. I was not offered any compensation for this, or any real apology, just shunted off to the side to wait it out. This took a good hour and a half, during which time I was needing to be reading for a meeting. Again, no apologies, just my card. The room was adequately clean (it had better be...) though sparsely furnished for the price. It did not feel very welcoming and the decoration was reminiscent of bad nights spent in hot, south coastal motels. I encountered several problems with on site amenities, both in room and out. Some staff tried to be helpful on occasion but were rarely able to make headway, even when I complained on the third night about rowdy neighbors. It seemed as if where there was not apathy or cluelessness there was barely concealed surliness. After the abysmal (lack of) service at the hotel bar I elected to eat out every other night (I declined to try the room service, unimpressed with every other offering so far). I would not use this hotel for my business or personal trips.\n", -1, 1], [364, "swissotel", "Swissotel Chicago: Don't let the shiny bright lights of the windy city fool you. This hotel does not provide the luxurious experience or stay as you might expect. Firstly, the provided appliances and room gadgets are of relatively low quality. For example, the window curtain for a small bedroom window nearly broke off it's support after trying to open them for a city view. The bedroom bed (King-sized) makes rattling noises on every turn of the body you make. Of coarse, this isn't too bad once you fall asleep, until then, it sucks! In regards to room services, the hotel workers are not all that friendly. They talk to you in a stubborn way, as if they just want to get it done and over with, just to get their pay-check. Yes they do all basic room service orders, but it is not all too friendly. Overall, this hotel has it's much noticeable flaws on top of the positives this hotel has (which is a bare minimum). With that being said, I would not recommend this hotel for anyone around the downtown Chicago area in need for at least average hotel services. However, if sub-par service and quality is okay for you, then this hotel could be suitable, however, considering it's prices, you are better off looking elsewhere for hotel rooms.\n", -1, 1], [52, "amalfi", "As a former Chicagoan, I'm appalled at the Amalfi Hotel Chicago. First of all, I was expecting luxury and hospitality, neither of which I received. There's an Experience Designer who is supposed to be like a \"personal concierge,\" but my experience with my ED was terrible. I felt like he was trying to pressure me into staying more days than I wanted to. Not only that, but I couldn't understand what he was saying most of the time because he was talking so fast. When I finally got to my room, I was disappointed with the quality of the furniture and the room's cleanliness. I had to ask for a maid to come and give me clean towels because some of the towels in the bathroom were damp. On top of that, the bed was messily done; I could have done a better job on my own bed at home. I was angry at this point, because I was paying a lot of money for every night I was staying at Amalfi, and I didn't expect to be greeted with wet towels. I needed to use the Wi-Fi to download some important documents, and the internet was surprisingly slow. Even a very basic hotel or motel could have offered better, maybe even faster internet access. When I finally checked out of the Amalfi, I made sure that my supposed personal concierge knew all of the problems I'd had with my room and the hotel. I was glad to see the Amalfi getting smaller in the mirror as I drove away!\n", -1, 1], [34, "allegro", "I was very unsatisfied with my stay at the Allegro. The front desk clerk seemed very put out when we walked up to her window. After giving her our confirmation number she let us know that our rooms were not ready yet. This came as a surprise to me since we arrived late in the day and check in had already began. After waiting an hour to check in we were not able to get the room features that we had requested. We were informed that they were \"only requests\" and not a guarantee. Room service was also very slow and appeared to be understaffed. When we finally got someone to answer the phone they were out of most everything we wanted. The food took an eternity to reach the room and the order wasn't exactly right either. This is not the kind of service I expected from an upscale hotel.\n", -1, 1], [109, "fairmont", "My husband and I recently stayed at the Fairmont Chicago Millennium Park. What I expected to be a very pleasant experience, turned out to be a stressful visit. We specifically reserved a non-smoking king room and paid the price for that reservation. Upon arrival, the hotel did not have any non-smoking rooms available and the representative at the check in desk was not helpful. As we had no other options, we accepted a smoking room with two queen beds. I can live with the bed situation but I truly feel that having to accept a room infused with cigarette smoke is completely wrong! There wasn't an area in the room where I did not feel nauseous from the stale smell and I cannot help but think that this smell followed me around all day after check out. To add insult to injury, the hotel staff was not sympathetic to our situation -- something I think they should be specifically trained to do -- and did not offer any compensation, partial refund or related \"perk\" to make up for our great inconvenience. Two staff members actually acted as if I was the inconvenience in asking them if there was anything they could do! Although we paid for the breakfast package, we were eager to leave immediately in the morning and dined elsewhere at our additional expense. Pardon the pun, but we just could not sit there and dine in the morning with such a bad taste in our mouth from the hotel's lack of customer service! I am hoping the corporate office responds to our complaints but, thus far, we have received no satisfaction. Needless to say, we will not be visiting this property again! In fact, we are no longer going to patronize this brand of hotels.\n", -1, 1], [139, "hardrock", "A few weeks ago we stayed at the Hard Rock Hotel in Chicago. The hotel was a bust from the get go. As we arrived in the lobby, we had to wait several minutes for the front desk clerk to show up. (We could hear her talking in the back for 5 minutes.) When she got to the desk she was very short with us and not very helpful. We had to wander around the halls looking for our room. Once we got to our room, we thought the weekend was going to get better. The rooms are modern and nicely designed. That was about all that this hotel had going for it though. As soon as we started to explore the room more, it was clear this room had been a haven for a party a few nights before. The bathroom smelled of vomit and the bath tub had small shards or glass from broken bottles in it. We called a worker and they cleaned most of it up, but the thought of it still remained. As we all settled down to sleep, there were a few loud noises coming from the room next door. After about an hour, we finally made a call to the front desk to complain. The woman said that a rock band was in that room and they had just finished a show in Chicago. They were staying there the next 2 nights. I wouldn't recommend this hotel to anyone! It's a hard rock hotel all right. (At least that's what the beds feel like!)\n", -1, 1], [124, "hardrock", "This was my first time staying at the Hard Rock hotel in Chicago and I have nothing but hate for the entire experience. The building itself is maintained, however the staff is rude and inept to the point of making their customers feel physically ill. And while the outside appearance is fine and dandy, my room 325, was repulsive. As soon as the bellboy threw my luggage onto the room's ground and verbally demanded a tip, I noticed insects of all kinds scurrying around, the room was pungent with what smelled like human excrement, before I could say anything to the bellboy he had taken his tip and fled. Immediately I went to the front desk and was made to wait for over a half hour, a complete waste of time, because as soon as I had reported my problem I was told that no other rooms were available and I would have to make do, they did however say I could stay the night free of charge. The next morning as I was set to leave I decided I would try the breakfast, in hopes of finding one redeeming quality. Let me tell you, that breakfast tasted like space food with dirt and mold, the worst breakfast I have ever had in my entire life. Overall the employees are arrogant and callous, with the work ethic of a 2 year old child, they cannot cook, the room for me was poorly maintained, however they are good at refunding your money.\n", -1, 1], [383, "talbott", "We chose the Talbott Hotel primarily for the location, but quickly discovered that the location was the only good thing about it. Although their website did a good job of selling their services and amenities, we found both severely lacking. We had mentioned to the reservationist when booking that this was to be a romantic weekend getaway for us - it was our anniversary. We asked for, and were promised, a king room. However, when we checked in, we were told by the front desk clerk that no king rooms were available. We could either take a double queen room, or pay significantly more for a suite. We took the key for our double queen room and were on our way. Upon arriving on our floor, we found a rowdy group of young girls running up and down the hallway, squealing and playing. It turns out that this hotel offers American Girl visits for the nearby store. It turns out that our romantic getaway room was in the center of a block of rooms reserved for a Girl Scout troop on an American Girl trip! We went back downstairs to request a move to another room, and were told no other double queen rooms were currently available. We explained that we were here for our anniversary, and the ambiance wasn't exactly what we were looking for. The clerk rolled her eyes and told us that she couldn't help us - they didn't have anything else. Sorry. Back upstairs we went. Tired from travel, we decided to order from room service for dinner. Our pasta, when it arrived, was barely warm and mediocre in flavor. We ate it anyway and prepared for bed. After using the bathroom, we discovered that the toilet in our room continued to cycle water after flushing. After jiggling the handle a few times and poking around in the tank, we couldn't get the water to stop running. It took three hours for a maintenance staff member to make their way up to our room to fix the problem. The next morning, after showering, I discovered the hair dryer didn't work properly. After pulling my wet hair back in a clip, we went out for the day. Upon our return, we expected to find our room made up and fresh. It hadn't been touched. We called downstairs to have someone sent up to clean it, but by the time we'd left for dinner, nobody had arrived. Our room wasn't made up that day. That night, the Girl Scouts sat in the hallway giggling and singing until well after 1am. We asked them several times to be quiet, but they didn't want to listen, and their chaperones were nowhere to be seen. We called down to the desk, and they told us \"they would take care of it\", but the girls continued to have their party in the hallway anyway. Nobody came to shoo them away. The next morning, I turned on the hairdryer, expecting it to work after reporting the difficulty the day before. It didn't! Stuck wearing my clip again, we checked out and made a mental note to select another hotel in the area for our next trip. This hotel had potential, but the staff doesn't care enough about your experience to allow me to recommend it to other travelers.\n", -1, 1], [306, "palmer", "My stay at The Palmer House Hilton was less than satisfactory. I would have expected much for from such a \"high end\" hotel. The rooms were way over priced, and the service was less than satisfactory. At one point, I left my dirty towels on the floor to be picked up, and when room service came through, they were still there! On the other side of things, the cup I had left on my desk (which I was planning to use later) was gone. My coffee and my towels were also never replaced. I also was astounded that internet service did not come with the price of the room. Rather, it was a \"nominal fee\". After paying so much for a room, I had hoped to at least have complimentary wifi. My stay at the Palmer House Hilton left much to be wished for. I will not be staying there again.\n", -1, 1], [298, "omni", "I will never stay here again. I was lured in by the hotel's pictures showing a fabulous suite. Instead I arrived to find cheap furniture that smelled of old cheese. I called the front desk to see if there was another room available. I was put on hold for five minutes and no one came back on the line. I ended up going to the front desk myself. I was ignored and not given assistance until I interrupted the front desk clerk who seemed to be on a personal call. The clerk apologize but then looked at me with an attitude when I requested another room because mine smelled like old cheese. I was informed that there were no other rooms available but that they would send up housekeeping. Housekeeping sprayed some Febreeze on the couch and then left. I tried to relax by turning on the TV in the bedroom. I sat on the bed and saw something scurry under the pillow. I checked the corner of the mattress and found bedbugs. I packed up my bags and left after that. I did get a refund on the room after some complaining. I went across town to the Marriott where I had a much better stay.\n", -1, 1], [291, "omni", "When my boyfriend and I checked into our room at the Omni Chicago, we were irritated to see that the bed looked rumpled, as if kids had been jumping on it. That was just the first of our \"issues\". The glasses in the bathroom had lipstick smears on them, and I saw a (dead-thank goodness!) roach behind the toilet. We were given the hotel night stay by a friend, so we decided to just deal with it. We ordered some munchies from the kitchen, and the chips were stale, and the dip smelled sour. After coming back from the convenience store with beer and some fresh munchies, we were able to enjoy our stay--but I would not recommend this place to anyone!\n", -1, 1], [4, "affinia", "If you are looking for a high end hotel on the Magnificent Mile, the Affinia Chicago is NOT your best option. First of all, the \"central\" location is not so convenient - there is quite a hike to the Navy Pier (which this hotel claims to be the \"official\" hotel of) and to the shops on the Mile. Secondly, the hotel is small - only 215 rooms, most of which are miniscule by comparison to the other hotels in the area. Thirdly, they have one restaurant and one lounge, both of which offer the same menu which seems a bit bizarre for a high end hotel. Finally the Affinia has one of the most rude staffs ever witnessed in a luxury hotel. One does expect some courtesy at the outrageous prices but be ready for the attitude and snobbery that will greet you at the Affinia!\n", -1, 1], [55, "amalfi", "I needed to find a last minute hotel to stay in for the night so i came to this one. First of all the prices for one night are extremely high. The workers at the front desk were not kind at all and treated me like i was a second rate and not on their list of priorities. Then i got into my room and got settled and it smelled of cigarettes and the air conditioner was making loud sounds so i didnt get much sleep. Also the restroom was very dirty and frankly disgusting. The beds were very old and uncomfortable and the tv did not work at all. Overall i am very disappointed with this hotel.\n", -1, 1], [114, "fairmont", "On my recent weekend stay at the Fairmont Chicago Millennium Park hotel, i was very disappointed. I chose this hotel after scouring various hotel websites in the area. From the look of the website, my expectations were above average. I felt the website led one to believe it was upscale. Upon my arrival, i checked in. I was shown my room and at first glance everything seemed fine with the room. As i was settling into the room, I began to notice a general lack of cleanliness. I noticed spiderwebs in corners, and a lack of cleanliness in the bathroom. Also, it was advertised that there was an i pod docking station in the room, however, it did not work and I had to call down for them to bring a replacement. I, as a guest should not have had to call down, these items should be checked to ensure they work properly before a guest checks in. I found the restaurants on site to be crowded, loud and not to mention an unusally long wait to be served my meal. I did inquire about a few of the menu items and my waiter seemed to have a lack of knowledge about the menu items. Overall, my experience was not good and the next time I am in the area, I will chose another hotel for my stay.\n", -1, 1], [350, "sofitel", "The Sofitel Chicago Water Tower in the downtown area is advertised as a four-star luxury hotel. However, modern architecture and a convenient location seem to be its only reliable perks. Room service is available 24 hours a day, but offers a limited variety of items and often lethargic service. Two bars are located on the premises, which is appealing at first. Once inside, patrons do not receive the quality of service that is to be expected and there is a complete absence of privacy, of any kind. The guest rooms are relatively spacious and clean, but a lack of adequate toiletries and personal items can interfere with a guests routine. Obtaining additional towels and grooming products is much too difficult. If you are a traveler who is in search of a relaxing and hassle-free experience, with reliable customer service, booking a room here is probably not a viable option.\n", -1, 1], [214, "intercontinental", "The International Chicago Magnificent Mile is shrouded in glamour, but underneath the facade fades away. The \"classical architectural landmark\" should be translated to \"old and boring. I found this hotel via Google and have regretted it ever since. Room size was small and unaccommodating, and that was one of the newer rooms! Everything was free except for the gym (why that wouldn't be free with the price I paid I don't know). This hotel is overpriced for the quality and size of the room that you get, and I would not recommend staying there.\n", -1, 1], [285, "omni", "The Omni Chicago Hotel was in one word, dreadful. The hotel is in the heart of the city and traffic is chaotic. The service is terrible. If you want to wait for your room for 3 and a half hours this is the place to go! Throughout a whole week, beds are made once and bathrooms are never cleaned. The hotel is no help when looking for a nice place to dine or a fun place to visit, they give no info for any activities going on in Chicago. This hotel should be listed in the top 10 WORST hotels in America. Do not waste your time nor money staying at the Omni Chicago Hotel.\n", -1, 1], [153, "hilton", "The Hilton Chicago, located on prime real estate in downtown Chicago, has not aged as gracefully as other hotels around the country opened during the same period of time. The hotel does maintain the appearance of luxury that has made it iconic, but that luxury is not in accord with 21st century standards. Lacking any form of fitness center, the Hilton is almost alone among the major hotels of Chicago in forcing its patrons to go elsewhere for a quick workout. Even nominal fees for wireless internet use in hotel rooms is very rare at this point, and the outrageous parking fee of $43 for guests will discourage out of towners from making the Hilton their destination. Most guest rooms are no different than any other Hilton anywhere, meaning that unless you are staying in the admittedly fantastic Executive suites, you will be paying a premium for a prosaic hotel experience.\n", -1, 1], [255, "knickerbocker", "While the hotel certainly seems to look beautiful, the hotel is actually far from it. Even booking a room online was rather difficult, and i wasn't able to reach a representative upon calling any of the contact numbers. In general coming here is a bad decision despite how it looks, its a mistake i wont make again and you shouldn't either.\n", -1, 1], [288, "omni", "First off, don't get a room on a lower floor, the garbage pick up makes a ton of noise and wakes you up at 6 am. Then don't bother going down for breakfast at that time either, because the restaurant isn't open that early. When it finally opened, the breakfast arrived cold and late. Nothing like congealed eggs to start your day. The fitness center had no towels and no cups for water. It was also too hot and too many people had sweated too much in it. After my congealed breakfast, it really was not pleasant. My entire three day visit was like that. I tried room service that night, but again, service was very slow and the food not warm when it arrived. My high speed internet was not so high speed when it would connect me at all. The furniture was run down and worn. Pool towels were not always available. Generally, for the price I paid, I would expect better service and a better maintained premises.\n", -1, 1], [283, "omni", "Did not enjoy my stay at the Omni Chicago Hotel. Firstly, the man at the front desk was extremely unhelpful. There was a problem with the reservation and he gave me and my family a lot of hassle. Secondly when we finally got the reservation sorted out, the air conditioning unit in our room would not go below 75 degrees. Considering I paid well over $250 per night for the Romance package reservation, it was below my standards and I will not be heading back to the Omni Chicago Hotel any time soon.\n", -1, 1], [341, "sofitel", "I needed a place to stay for a business conference in Chicago. While higher priced, the reviews online plus four stars convinced me. Granted the hotel itself is beautiful, but looks can be deceiving. The pictures online show beautiful white linens but mine were a bit grey. The restaurant (Cafe Des Architect) had amazing food, so that was a plus, but the service was awful. I had to wait twenty minutes for a glass of water! My remote wouldn't work for the tv and the air conditioner was far too loud. The hotel must've been hosting a convention because I could hear music all through the night. The housekeeping was good but happened too infrequently. I called twice for more fresh towels. If I wanted this type of experience, I'd have stayed at a lower-end hotel. Same experience, less money!\n", -1, 1], [313, "palmer", "Upon entering my hotel room at The Palmer House Hilton I immediately turned my nose up at a foul odor coming from the bathroom. After placing my bags on a poorly made bed I walked into the bathroom to find the last visitor had failed to flush the toilet. I immediately called room service and asked for a new room. They apologetically told me there were no other rooms available but would send someone right up to handle the mess. After oh around a half hour of waiting a very angry maid knocked at my door. She seemed very irritated to have to deal with the mess and looked at me as if I should have been the one dealing with it. After the room was cleaned up she turned to me as if asking for a tip. I hesitated and she angrily stormed out of the room. I thought things would run smoother and tried to relax with an ipod. Yes you can use your ipod in the room however what they fail to mention is the constant white noise because the signals are so poor. And nothing could compare to the remote control heating and air. When I was able to get the buttons on the remote to work the temperature seemed to change on its own. If I wanted hot air it would slowly get colder and vise versa. After giving up on a nice television program I decided to retire to bed. Egyptian sheets? Right! All I can say is I found myself early to check out and in a new hotel within the next hour. If you value your back do not rent a room from this hotel.\n", -1, 1], [123, "hardrock", "Hi, I had very bad experience with this hotel, as the rooms had bad smell and very dim light. the bed sheets were not properly cleaned. Also the carpet was dirty though AC was working properly. But i would nor recommend this hotel to my friends as it did not satisfied me. There was a problem with hot and cold water in the bathroom. Please do not go to this hotel, it seems very nice from the pictures and all but in actual its different.\n", -1, 1], [318, "palmer", "Our visit started off on the wrong foot when we entered the lobby struggling to carry all of our luggage and, instead of helping, a group of hotel employees stood watching and laughing at us. They had trouble locating our reservation. Our room was tiny! When I'm paying over $400 a night for a room, I expect to be able to walk around in it! The beds were also tiny. The walls were thin and we could hear our neighbors talking next door. This hotel was probably once beautiful and classy, but now it seems to be outdated and due for repairs. Won't be staying here again.\n", -1, 1], [327, "sheraton", "For the price, you would think this would be a top quality hotel, but it was nowhere close. Service at check-in was slow and unfriendly. The room was even worse. It was small, dirty and smelled like stale cigarette smoke even though I had requested a non-smoking room. The cover on the bed was stained, there was hair all over the bathroom floor, and the curtain rod was almost falling off the wall. Everything looked tired and in desperate need of a remodel. I also didn't appreciate having to pay for wifi, when other premium hotels offer it for free. Overall, this was one of the worst hotels I have stayed at in a long time, and considering the price, it was terrible.\n", -1, 1], [30, "allegro", "Upon my arrival at the Hotel Allegro in Chicago I had to wait to be helped by a bellman for 10 minutes while I waited outside in the towncar. The bellman that ended up assisting me dropped two of my suitcases as he pushed his cart through the lobby. The front desk service rep was busy on the phone when I approched and raised a finger to me to hold on while she finished her call. Once I recieved my key and entered my room I realized that I had been checked into a dirty room. I called the front desk and asked for a new room and the same desk rep. that I had previously checked in with told me that there wern't anymore available rooms. She told me that I needed to come back down to the lobby. As I approched the desk I heard her yelling at a housekeeper. She then told me that it would be a 15 minute wait and my room would be ready. I didn't have the energy to complain at that point having traveled on a plane for the past 4 hours so I just sat in the lobby waiting for my room to be cleaned. While I was waiting I watched another person being checked in and they were not only given a room without a reservation but they were upgraded to a suite at no extra charge - why was I not given that suite after what I just went through? 35 minutes later the desk rep came over to me and let me know that my room was ready. I went back up to the same room that I had previously entered. It was clean but there was no toliet paper and no towels. I called back down to the desk rep and she said house keeping would be on thier way with the items. If my stay wasn't already horrible enough after I changed and went down to the 312 retaurant connected to the hotel I ended up having to wait 30 minutes after the reservation I had made to be seated. The meal was ok but nothing like I had expected it to be when I read about it online. I can honestly say I will never be returning to this hotel nor this restaurant.\n", -1, 1], [18, "affinia", "I truly am not the sort of person to write a negative review about an establishment, but my time spent at the Affinia Hotel in Chicago forced me to do so. It was to be our first trip to Chicago since I was a boy so my wife and I were very excited to arrive and begin our short weekend getaway as soon as we checked into the hotel. First I must say that the counter help was far less than helpful. The apparently confused person who was to sign us in was extremely out matched when it came to the workings of the hotel computer and was total inept at customer service. He said we had not reserved a room, which I had weeks earlier, and proceed to explain to us that his hotel does not make mistakes of this kind and that WE must be mistaken as to the reservation or the hotel or both. Finally the manager arrived after I insisted on his presents. He did straiten out the confusion, but the room we were lead to was much smaller than we were lead to believe and had not even been cleaned from the last occupants. I called down to the front and demanded that the manager walk himself to our room and see the condition of the place. We were shown to another room, this time to our liking. From that point on nothing and no one that we saw or had contact with worked or acted as one would expect from a hotel with the reputation that the Affinia had. To list just a few; the television was a 13 inch black and white which could get only 4 channels, the food that room service brought up was cold, lifeless and bland, the cleaning person knocked at our door at 5 in the morning every morning even with the 'Do Not Disturb' sign on the door, and there was this ever so slight smell of mold and vomit which passed through the hallway every time my wife and I lift the room. To be blunt, I truly hope that the CEO of the company reads this note and fires the entire staff, guts the building thoroughly, and is publicly flogged in a downtown park. WE WILL NEVER STEP THROUGH THE DOORS OF THE AFFINIA AGAIN.\n", -1, 1], [371, "swissotel", "I recently had the misfortune of staying at the Swissotel Chicago hotel in Illinois, and it was one of the worse travel experiences I have ever had! First off the shuttle that was suppose to pick us up at the air port was late by over an hour! Then when the bus finally came, the driver was nice enough but it was clearly his first day on the job since he got lost going back to the hotel. Finally when we got to the hotel they didn;t seem to have our reservation for the 2nd room. (my wife and I stay in one room, our teenage girls usually stay in their own room.) So after the very rude clerk at the corner did nothing to help us we were forced to pack into one room. we would have rented another room but they had no vacancies left. They hotel did have a large occupancy rate, but that only slowed up everything else. our room service was late almost everytime we ordered, and the hotel restaurant never had a wait less then 45 mins. The quality of the room was fair enough, but it was almost impossible to get room service, we could not get fresh towels for almost 2 days! We were suppose to stay for a week, we left after 4 days and found a different hotel to stay at. I would not recommend this place to anyone! stay away!\n", -1, 1], [292, "omni", "Recently staying at the Omni Chicago Hotel, was a waste of money. The rooms are typical standard rooms,(unless you want to pay an unreasonable amount for one of the premier rooms), the service from the staff was nothing to rave about unless, your ideal, idea of service is waiting in the lobby for 40 minutes waiting for anybody to help you carry your heavy luggage up to your room. Sorry to say in short I think my money would have been better spent staying at a HoJo's.\n", -1, 1], [157, "hilton", "I stayed at the Hilton Chicago during a recent business trip. I elected to go with their Executive Suite upgrade. All I can say is, \"What upgrade?\" It's barely anything above what you get normally. And for the price I paid, I was expecting much better acommodations. Because I arrived around 10:30 the night I checked in (delayed flight) I did not get the concierge service as it stops at 10. I find that an odd hour to stop a service like that especially when you're expecting a guest who has not checked in yet. Beyond that, it took them 20 minutes to get me into my room. First it was a room mix-up, then it was a missing key card. That was extremely frustrating as I was tired and I had a presentation to give the next morning. Speaking of the next morning, the complimentary breakfast was a joke. When I just want a stale muffin and a bad cup of coffee for breakfast, I'll stay at the next Super 8 I find. And the wireless internet in the room that you actually have to pay for on top of everything else was a horrible connection with angonizingly slow speed. I will not be staying at the Hilton Chicago every again even though I frequent Chicago. This tops out my list of horrible hotel experiences by a long shot.\n", -1, 1], [879, "ambassador", "has gone downhill so much we almost checked out. We stayed in the Dean Martin Celebrity Suite for 3 nights while entertaining customers in Chicago. We've stayed there for many years and while not up to date like the Four Seasons or the Peninsula, it has always been a comfortable and clean, service oriented hotel. Not only has room service been eliminated (if you want room service it comes from Marios Italian restaurant down the street, so is ONLY Italian), complimentary morning coffee is no longer available, mini bars have been removed from the rooms, etc. etc. The only restaurant, the Pump Room was closed for a private function on Saturday night, the bar also, so we weren't even able to have an after dinner drink with our guests. Surely the function was planned before we made our reservations, but we weren't told of it. We also learned that the bell staff (who have been there for 13 and 8 years) is being eliminated. So, in other words, anyting to do with \"service\" is gone from this hotel. I hear they are going to begin renovations in December, but that is no excuse to let an old glory \"go to pot\" in the meantime. We won't be staying here when we go back in July or for Thanksgiving. We even had to pay for internet. Mind you, our bill for 3 nights was 900.00+, no room service, no restaurant/bar charges. Highway robbery for what you get ow at the Ambassador East. Sad.\n", -1, 0], [977, "homewood", "We planned to stay for 5 nights on a family trip. I booked this hotel because of the expected value for a suite as well as the free breakfast - get a quick bite, then head out for the day to do normal tourist stuff. Well, our stay here lasted 1 night and we quickly, and thankfully, switched to a different hotel for our last 4 nights. The room was dirty. When we opened the sofabed, the sheets were filthy and there was a mess of dirt and crumbs that fell out. Ridiculous considering this is a suite hotel where the sofabeds are likely used, and theoretically cleaned, a lot. Extra blankets were also dirty and bathrooms weren't much better. Temperature control in the room was imprecise - minor inconvenience but without clean blankets on our only night, it made for a cold stay. If you like to eat for free (they have free breakfasts and dinner on certain nights) and don't care to eat the great food Chicago has to offer, I guess some may find this place tolerable. But we found the buffet no better than average and felt like we were at a Golden Corral. The only thing this hotel really has going for it is location but there are other options in this area (we switched to The James and had a great experience). I couldn't be paid to stay here again. I'm shocked by the high overall rating given our experience.\n", -1, 0], [876, "ambassador", "The hotel is just ok. Stayed there for 5 days when visiting friends. They had a renovation going so there was no lobby, bar or anything. Just a decently furnished room for 200 usd. The renovation was not annoying but i think they ahould charge... much less untill its done. You cant beat the location! Very convenient especially if u like chicqgo nightlife!\n", -1, 0], [1092, "omni", "Will start by saying the employees were wonderful, especially in the restaurant / bar employees, could not have been nicer.....what appeared to be the hotel manager went above and beyond....Unfortunately, that's where it ends! The rooms, in my opinion, appeared different then pictures and were worn and ratty...you know, uninviting sofa and crappy coffee table and desk area... the first room I was given had bright construction lights shining in my room and men working on the next building that were looking directly into my window!!I kid you not; they seemed as if they were about 15-20 ft from my window!! And this was after I specifically had asked for a room that might have a decent view..I was then switched to a room that had virtually no light and was truly, again... just worn out!!!NOT a 4 star hotel, this seemed to be closer to a 2, perhaps being extremely kind 3 star...I travel on business so I know the difference...I merely touched the cabinet door on the bar unit and it literally fell off in my hand! I complained to a very nice woman from housekeeping and to her credit, she made sure the door was fixed ASAP. They gave me a bottle of wine to compensate..which I utilized to dull my senses as to my surroundings for the next 2 days....I wanted to give Omni a shot...big mistake... Unfortunately, brought a friend with me to show her how great Chicago was and I was soooo embarrassed, as I had chosen the hotel...She was extremely disappointed as well...should have gone with my first instinct which was the Conrad!! Lesson learned!\n", -1, 0], [871, "ambassador", "I can see how this place must have been gorgeous at one time but they really need a makeover. 1. There was a huge gaping hole in the carpet on the bedroom floor. I kid you not. How can they have guests in a room where the carpet looks like it had been mauled by a giant earthworm? 2. The furniture was severely chipped. Ok. I dont mind chipped furniture if I am slumming it in my just-out-of-college-sister's apartment. But for 170+ a night, I want a room that does not look like it was furnished with stuff retrieved from a dumpster drive 3. The receptionist while I was checking in was super curt. I know it was late but isnt that sort of your job? Not everything was horribly bad though. The one star is for the bathroom that was super clean. I do not recommend this place at all.\n", -1, 0], [1074, "monaco", "I am staying here now and actually am compelled to write this review before I fall asleep. The front desk staff were brief and one of them was chatting with her friend (gossiping) as I checked in (VERY unprofessional). The room she offered me was on a 'high' floor (5th.... HA) and when I checked in there was a big bag of grapes left behind by the previous guest on the window sill and some of the previous guests hair in the bathtub....I was DONE. Called down and had them re-clean the room; they made no offer to compensate or upgrade...not even a bottle of wine. The front desk clerk suggested I come down and get a key to another room (like I have time for that). Disappointing as I do like Kimpton hotels and am a Kimpton In Touch member (btw they've done away with the amenities...you just get a free item from the mini bar).\n", -1, 0], [1195, "talbott", "I found this hotel in the \"Small Luxury Hotels of the World\" booklet having stayed in many of these in recent years, and they were indeed above and beyond average hotels. I therefore chose it for a 4 night stay while visiting from England. The Talbott was excellently located, although i had a view of a building site, and did have an ambience and some charm, however it was a little dirty and faded around the edges and the service was appalling. I had to wait in the foyer well after check in time, having previously attempted to check in earlier, tired and in need of a rest, while a \"final check\" was done to my room. The valet parking was not outside when requested, breakfast was not included in the price, all the things requested of reception did not occur, and there were very few touches which make a hotel stay special. I have stayed in hotels which are so much more elegant, where the staff and service are first rate for half the price of this hotel. I was severely disappointed and cannot recommend it at all.\n", -1, 0], [1016, "intercontinental", "It is always interesting going to a high quality Hotel. I cannot help but think about the service and the value. Maybe I have too high expectations. Certaintly the location is great and the swimming pool is really nice and the room was generally well appointed oh and the bed was great. But, the room was not well cleaned, a little smelly truthfully and they stole a watch that I left in the room. The hotel where immediately worried about there financial situation and not the service. I noticed here others on this site have lost stuff from this hotel. I know that this is always a possibility but really did not expect it at a hotel like this. Overall, Chicago exceeded my expectations but the intercontinental did not. Stay else where.\n", -1, 0], [818, "affinia", "My husband and I stayed overnight at the Affinia. Prior reviews led us to believe this was a quality hotel; not true. Since it was a very special occasion, and also because we were only staying overnight, we didn't let the shabbiness and poor service of the hotel ruin our weekend. However, this would have qualified as one of the poorest hotel experiences. I've ever had. First, the smells: The linens and pillows on our bed smelled moldy and mildewy. The odors were not mild, and I found it pretty repulsive. I couldn't wait to jump out of bed in the morning, to get away from the odors. Hard to sleep and certainly didn't want to be in the bed any longer than absolutely necessary. I didn't discover how disgusting the bed smelled until around midnight when we got into bed. At that point, I chose not to contact housekeeping because (a) I was exhausted, and (b) I didn't want to upset my husband, who had fallen immediately to sleep after a long day of sightseeing. Also, the bathroom smelled like vinegar. Perhaps this is the cleaning agent used by Affinia, but the odor should have dissipated over the course of our stay and it never did. Incidentally, the bathroom floor tiles and wallpaper looked like they had seen better days; not a well-maintained property. Second, the elevators: If you stay above the first few floors, there are only two elevators that run from ground level to the rooftop c-view bar. With so many floors to service, and so many people going up to the c-view bar on a saturday, these elevators took forever to come, and were often full they did. Annoying. Also, on one occasion, there were several bottles (water and soda) left in the elevator; clearly, the maintenance crew doesn't inspect and clean the common areas frequently. Finally, and perhaps the most disappointing was the service when we arrived. First, when we booked, we asked for as quiet a room as possible. The hotel is located near Northwestern Memorial Hospital. But, its proximity to Michigan Ave., and the lack of accomodations elsewhere (due to the Transformers movie filming and a big international convention taking place the same week-end), led us to stay here anyway. At check-in, the clerk noted our request, and said our room was quiet room since it was not \"next to the elevators.\" When we arrived at our room, we discovered that we were across from the elevators. Obviously, she was technically correct that we weren't next to the elevators, but it was still so close (15-20 feet) that we could hear the elevator noise. Also, since it was a special occasion, we asked if we could upgrade. The disingenuous, snarky, condescending clerk told us that checking in early was an upgrade. Clearly, the woman has not travelled enough to know that in many quality hotels, this is a matter of routine, not exception. Pretty awful experience all the way around. Other reviewers must have very low expectations. Can't explain any of the good reviews otherwise.\n", -1, 0], [875, "ambassador", "We traveled to Chicago to visit with our daughter who lives in the city. To our suprise what once was a lovely older hotel is now under major renovations. Gone is the lobby and gusts are required to walk down to the basement to get the one... elevator that is working to the second floor to register. Our first room was recently renovated.....stark white walls, no amenities at all. Guests had to enter the room and find their way to the bed to turn on the light to the room. Modern furniture includes a bed that is close to the groud, a cold blck slab functioning a a desh and metal chair. No fride, coffee maker, iron, or even a picture on the stark white walls. We asked to change our room and then were put in one of the older suites on the 15th floor. While this room was attractive, we were greeted to jack hammers at 8 every morning. The staff were all very nice but the accommodations were lacking. lake shore drive\n", -1, 0], [918, "fairmont", "This hotel was chosen by my husband's company as the family came along for the business trip. The location was excellent and we had a great view of the lake and aquarium from the 34th floor. My first impressions were that the room was very nice and everything appeared to be clean. The lobby was undergoing renovation at the entrance, but was otherwise ok. Lots of conferences were taking place so the wait for the elevators was long. Seemed like only 2 elevators were working out of the 6 that were there. I had read from another reviewer to join the Fairmont President's club and wi-fi in the room would be free. We signed up for the club, but were puzzled as to why they don't just offer everyone free wi-fi. Parking fees were exorbitant at $58/night, but thankfully the company was paying for this. We were able to walk to Millennium Park and Navy Pier from our hotel. The hotel is NOT kid-friendly in terms of restaurants or amenities. There is no swimming pool, but the concierge arranged for us to swim at the Swissotel next door (there is an underground tunnel that connects the Fairmont there). We loved the Swissotel's pool on the 42nd floor. Fantastic views from the pool! Although the beds were comfortable, my daughter and I were both victims of bed bugs during our stay. Unfortunately we didn't know until the next day after we returned home. Apparently bed bug bites can take up to 7 days to appear. My daughter and I both shared a bed and were bitten on our sides from our necks to our hips. The bites made you want to claw your skin off! My husband and son who shared the other bed were not bitten at all. Beware of room 3405 -- bed nearest the bathroom!!! I will not be fooled by a clean room again and will be checking under mattresses from now on....\n", -1, 0], [936, "hardrock", "This is a tough one to review... as the star ratings were from 1 star to 5 and had to figure out an average.... 2 is where it was. Here are my tips and props/complaints: Room: 1 Star. I had a corner suite. The room was pretty nasty actually (2703..STAY AWAY FROM IT!!!). There was a CONSTANT banging noise from above. When I first got in I thought it was the person above me bumping and grinding. After an hour, I knew even if it was someone high on speed and redbull would not be going that strong. Well, the sound continued on for 3 days. Not that I minded too much as I keep things on for white noise... but it sure would bug others. Also, there were about 10 cig burns on the carpet and sofa. In addition, it looked like someone left the iron on the sofa. Also, there is a gray furry pillow on the bed that looks like a big dead rat. I could not imagine all the DNA left on that thing either. *gags* Bathroom: Nice size but not great. The faucet was lose (really lose) and the toilet would not flush right. Service: Great. Everyone I encountered did a great job making me feel welcome. Good stuff. Food: I had meetings there, so experienced the breakfast and lunch they made. It was really good... much better than most hotels. Bar: Very cool. Good music, great service and good drinks. The scene was decent as well. Small bar, but was not cramped. So, maybe other rooms are nicer... well hell they better be. Regardless, if ONE room is like that (especially a \"suite\"), I have to think others are like that as well. It is too bad though. The views are great and they actually have windows that open... big shocker for the city in general!\n", -1, 0], [1023, "james", "Just returned from the James Hotel after staying at the Park Hyatt. I have stayed at most Chicago Hotels: Pennisula, Four Seasons, The Ritz, Fairmont etc. Had heard a little about the James and the Primehouse at the James. We paid MORE for the room at the James then at any of the above mentioned hotels. What a disappoitment! The room we stayed in had 2 double beds. The toilet broke and overflowed, the tub didnt drain while showering and the HUGE bathroom door that was almost too heavy to close broke several times. The closet had no door but a curtain to close and no drawer space for clothes at all. The room was very small and non descript. Much like staying at an IKEA but without the color. Windows to outside terribly dirty and the elevators dirty and small. The staff however was top notch and exceptionally helpful and friendly. The room had a huge 52\" plasma TV that was nice. There is NO way this hotel is 4 star yet. The room rate close to $500.00 a night was WAY of of line. We paid more here than any of the above mentioned hotels. The rate should have been about half of that.\n", -1, 0], [971, "homewood", "This review has two parts. . .I advise reading both. Chapter One: The actual hotel and staff I found the in house staff to be very friendly and accommodating. The room was nice and clean as well. I have no disagreement with any of the other reviews regarding the hotel room or the staff. This is a great location where you can walk three blocks to to the South to reach the riverfront, or a few blocks to reach the water tower to the North. Very easy (one block) walk from the subway (Red line). The morning complimentary breakfast is substantial. Not just muffins and coffee. You can have a complete breakfast here if you want. And, even the breakfast servers were really nice and efficient. I would recommend this hotel IF based solely on the physical location, the room, and the staff. Chapter Two: The nightmare I booked this room through central reservations in July for a mid-September arrival. The rate was quoted to me as $159 per night for four nights. When the confirmation was emailed to me, it was incorrect by over $300. I immediately called the hotel. They said they made the correction and emailed a new confirmation with the correct amount. I did receive the corrected confirmation email. . .All done? NO. One week later, my credit card statement arrives with the old higher amount having been charged. I called the hotel and was transferred to central reservations to resolve. When I explained the error, I was literally called a liar by the person in reservations, and told \"That's not my problem. I can't help you\". . . and then told that I have to pay the higher amount. Excuse ME? Now, I go back to calling the hotel manager to get some assistance. After a few left messages, I get the general manager to call me back, and discuss the issue. After taking down all of the names of people I spoke with, he assures me that he will credit the account immediately. I even get a call from someone in his accounting dept to confirm my credit card etc. . . One week later, still no credit. So, I call the general manager again. Oh, this might take up to 72 hours to process, I am told. So, please give it another week. Another week passes, still no credit. So another call to the manager. I am told now that the credit HAS been processed, and he even sends me an email confirming our \"agreement\" for the credit, just to appease me. Another week passes. Still, not seeing that credit that was \"definitely processed\" a week ago. Yet another call to the general manager on the day before I am to leave on my trip to Chicago. I told him I will be arriving, and at this point, I want to see him personally, and he can physically use my credit card to process the credit while I am there. Remember, we are now talking SIX WEEKS and this is still not resolved. I arrive at the hotel, and to make a long story short, the general manager was NEVER available to see me, nor did he make any attempts to schedule any time to see or talk with me. The only person I spoke face to face with, was the assistant general manager. He was completely unconcerned with my situation, and made the completely inappropriate statement to me of \"you realize this boils down to a matter of 'he said she said'\". . . WHAT???? Today, my trip is over, and I have flown back home. I STILL HAVE NOT RECEIVED THE CREDIT TO MY ACCOUNT!!! I will absolutely be reporting all of this to Hilton Corporate Customer Service, and will absolutely be disputing the entire amount at this point. Take this little adventure into consideration when dealing with this hotel.\n", -1, 0], [1099, "omni", "My son & I joined my husband on a work trip. We planned to swim while he was working. We overheard a lady asking when the pool would open as as we were checking in. Though my son was eager to swim as soon as we checked in the pool was still closed at 630 pm. We gave up & went out for the evening. We had a very noisy sleepless night. We weren't facing MI ave, but still heard sirens and I'm not sure what the other noise was, but it sounded like a malfunctioning hand dryer in our ceiling that would sound off about 20x an hour throughout the entire night. I called the front desk the next morning and was told the pool was open, so my (very excited) son got his bathing suit on and we got to the fitness center only to be told by housekeeping that the pool was closed for construction. Upon calling the front desk again the lady claimed she was unaware of the maintenance crew's actions & on my insistence she said she'd look into it. A gentleman called back an hour later & said the pool should open at 5pm...it was 9am. It is now 6pm & we still haven't even seen the pool. We check out tomorrow. We passed up time with grandparents who are in for the holiday to \"swim in Chicago.\" Needless to say we are VERY disappointed.\n", -1, 0], [890, "conrad", "I stayed here 2 nights for a business conference. The food was pretty good. And they had these really good mints that I couldn't resist. The room was very comfortable and the bed was great. But I was annoyed by many issues. First, their internet went down for a couple of hour when I was there on a break from the conference. It wouldn't have been big deal except I needed to do some business while it was down. Second, the internet wasn't available in the conference rooms. I suppose the conference I attended would have had to pay extra for it. Third, The chair in the room was too low for the desk so I was in an awkward position while using my computer which gave me a back ache later. Fourth, on the second night my key didn't work. So I asked for a new one which also didn't work. So I asked for another one and the same thing happened. Thankfully the front desk asked a security guy to meet me up at my room so I didn't have to go back down to the lobby a third time. Then he came back a little later to tell me I was in the wrong room, which I wasn't. Finally, he came back with the right key. Fifth, the TV had one remote control for changing the channels and a different one for the volume. Sixth, they didn't have the comedy channel. Much cheaper hotels do. If this hotel didn't cost so much money all of these things would be minor inconveniences, but I would expect more for what I paid.\n", -1, 0], [833, "allegro", "I am usually a big fan of Kimpton Hotels, but this place is awful !!! I would rate it poor from the moment we arrived to the moment we left. It is an old, dark and damp hotel that they slapped a coat of paint on to make it look more \"botique\" . The carpets are dirty, and tattered; patrons are walking around the lobby in their barefeet. yuck!!! The bathrooms are tiny, and the floors look like they have a layer of flith on them. When we called down to the desk to ask for them to be cleaned, we were brushed off and told they were made to look that way. We woke up on the first morning to find multiple wads of gum on the lobby table. We told the front desk, called housekeeping, and then called the front desk again..finally after several hours someone came and cleaned the gum. The elevators are slow, and often only one is working at any given time. I did not find the staff to be friendly at all, except for one waiter @ breakfast. What a disappointment :(\n", -1, 0], [926, "hardrock", "Great building and location, but... staff is indifferent, you have to pay for WiFi (after $300 usd/night I would expect at least free WiFi), no pool in the building and something I found really annoying is that, if you move anything from the minibar, they have sensors that automatically charge you. This is ridicoulus.The iPod dock in the room didn't work. Also, we had to move thenightstand between beds and found dirt all over. Definitely is not value for your money. You're just paying for the Hard Rock brand. I will never go back to a Hard Rock Hotel.\n", -1, 0], [934, "hardrock", "HI HO HI HO, off to Chicago we go. Here's the skinny, if you're hoping to run into a washed up rock star (CeCe Deville for us, and no the teenagers had no idea who he was) you may want to spend your hard earned money here. I took my younger sister and a couple of her friends (teenagers) for an overnighter in Chicago on our way to Wisconsin. I chose the Hard Rock for the ambiance. I mean come on it is supposed to be \"COOL\". Well it wasn't. The Positives: *It is in the Carbon & Carbide Building, which is beautiful. *The location: it sits in the middle of everything *The lobby has two computers for guest use. *The fitness center is very nice. Cardio machines have individual TV's and there are head phones in case you forgot yours. They have protein bars for those that like them for a post workout snack. *Check-in and out was quick and Valet was very courteous. The Negatives: *The rooms were small and ours wasn't clean (pistachio shells on the floor). The rooms were painted purplish gray (we were on the Prince floor) with a picture of Bob Marley hanging on one of the walls. The girls thought the coolest part about the hotel was the fuzzy throw pillows. *Bathroom had only a shower and not a full tub. *The cable reception was poor; I kept looking for the bunny ears to fix the picture. *It isn't anywhere near the Hard Rock Cafe. *There was very little memorabilia. *There is no pool, and yes I knew this when I made the reservation. To wrap it up, I won't be staying here again. If I am going to drop almost 4 Benjamins on a hotel room, I will stay at the Palmer House Hilton. But that is a whole different review.\n", -1, 0], [1182, "talbott", "We chose to stay at a small hotel because we did were looking for a hotel with less crowds. We anticipated we would get better service in a smaller hotel, than some of the other larger high rise hotels. We did not experience very good service at the Talbott Hotel. When we checked Irena seemed very robotic and aloof. The front desk clerks were neither welcoming nor gracious. The lobby is small and the front desk is just a few feet from the front door. Each time we came into the hotel we were never greeted nor even received a smile from the staff, just a blank stare and gaze. The front desk staff was chilly and stiff, no greetings, no smiles and no personality. They had difficulty answering simple questions or requests. On the other hand the bellman Perry was great. He was sociable and very service oriented. He was aware of what is going on in the area. He recognizes the guests and he offered suggestions about things to do in the immediate area, and where to eat in the neighborhood. He is authentic and he even asked us upon our return \"how was that restaurant?\" Tim the concierge was also supportive. He gave us 10% discount coupons for shopping at the major department stores. We had the largest suite. We requested a rollaway (extra charge) when we made our reservation and we had to ask five different times to have the rollaway bed delivered to our room before it came after 10PM. When the rollaway finally came we had to call back the front desk because they did not deliver a blanket or pillow with the bed. What made our Talbott hotel experience most disappointing was that we may have never received any housekeeping unless we had asked to have our room cleaned. We were out of our room from 8AM and when we returned to our room at 4PM the rooms had not been cleaned. We called the front desk to ask to send someone. The maid rushed to clean our room while we had to shower and change for the evening. The room itself was pleasant. It did have a moldy smell and some Frabreez would have been nice to bring along since the windows do not open much. We were next to a noisy neighbor and the walls were thin. We really liked staying in this area of Chicago but expected first rate service. The service was very weak and unacceptable for this class of hotel.\n", -1, 0], [925, "hardrock", "Move beyond the rock theme and it's an average hotel with a good location. Room was unbearably hot and the controls on the wall did nothing. Thank goodness the window opened or we'd have been cooked alive. That of course let in all the noise from Michigan Ave. This combined with our neighbors door slamming against their thrown door lock every 30 seconds made for a lively setting. Room was stuffy too. Burn marks on carpet lead me to believe nasty smokers had occupied room on many occasions. Wife happy w/ Aveda in bath. Base bar was good with great service and well made drinks tho pricey.\n", -1, 0], [1068, "monaco", "Over-hyped and over-priced. The fact that they have a complimentary wine reception every night at 5 doesnt take away from the fact that they have terrible beds and the place isnt as clean as it should be for a 4 star hotel. The hallways smelled like a dog parlor and the carpets in my room look like they hadn't been cleaned...well, ever. The decorative pillows on my bed were so filthy they were actually stained brown and looked like they had been sitting outside for everyone to use and then put back on my bed. The decor of the hotel was nice and eclectic but it wasnt enough to convince me to ever stay here again. The bed was the most uncomfortable thing I have every tried to sleep on. I couldnt sleep the whole week that I stayed there. It was hard and lumpy and the pillows were tiny. my final say is that it is an over priced Holiday Inn.....\n", -1, 0], [1026, "james", "Me, My sister and my best friend all went to stay here in the summer of 2004...they said there all spacious suites...yeah right...our room you could barely walk in...and they said theres 2 double beds...yeah well one was a pull out couch...and the bathroom...tiny tiny tiny...and it took forever and a day to check in and the people blamed us for throwing a book out the window and somehow someone knew exactly where it fell from and which room...yeah...i wouldnt stay here again\n", -1, 0], [821, "allegro", "This hotel must have originally been an ordinary downtown hotel in a not very nice neighborhood. The owners have painted it over and fixed up the lobby to make it an \"upscale\" overpriced boutique hotel. But it's still just an ordinary hotel with a paint job. Stay here if you want to experience staying in a flophouse, but with all the sleaze removed. Definitely stay at the chain's other location, the Burnham, for a much, much nicer hotel.\n", -1, 0], [1050, "knickerbocker", "I stayed here for 5 nights last summer. I booked the reservation on priceline for $75/night which was the cheapest rate I could find anywhere during a convention week. Anyway, when I arrived at 11 pm from the airport, I was told that they had overbooked the hotel and had no room for me. They booked me at a dumpy 2 star motel by the airport. They gave me $20 for a taxi to get there, and it cost me $35. I was late for a meeting the next morning because of the extra travel and packing/unpacking. The Millennium offered no compensation whatsoever for their foul-up. No free drink, no room upgrade, nothing. Since I booked on the internet, I was chopped liver. Beware.\n", -1, 0], [1047, "knickerbocker", "I stayed at the hotel for 5 nights in mid-March and was so disappointed with everything. The room was small, the carpets in the looby were smelly, no bathtub in the washroom and view of brick walls from the windows. Not even free internet which even the cheapest hotels offer these days. It costs $10/day to connect to internet. If you want to use internet in the lobby, minimum charge is $5 per use. To use the phone in the rooms for local calls, it is $1.25/15mins and then 10 cents every min. Even the local calls are charged, what a rip off!!! Every hotel I have stayed at offers free intercontinetal breakfast, of course no such thing at this hotel. No indoor pool, go figure. I won this from bidding process at priceline, I will be reluctant to use this service and this hotel in future.\n", -1, 0], [1128, "sheraton", "Firtly they took $372 off my card, even though they also took the same amount off of one of my friends for staying an extra night. They had no business taking the money off of my card. So on the 28th Sep I contacted them and they admited to the mistake. It is not a month later and I have called them about 6 times in all and they have still not paid it back. Secondly I booked 8 rooms at buy 2 get 3rd room free direct with hotel. When I looked a week later, they had only booked 7 and refused to offer me the rate 3rd room free rate, so two of my friends didn't come to the trip away. Thirdly I asked if the initial money for all rooms could be taken ASAP as the dollar was weak against the pound. After about 8 phone calls over 5 months (each saying they would) they eventually took the money and the whole trip cost an additional PS150. Overall, the hotel was nice and in a nice location, but I will never be staying there again due to all my problems.\n", -1, 0], [810, "affinia", "Stayed at the Fitzpatrick before, about 4 years ago, it was ok. The management was great, staff was so kind, and rooms were clean. ** But this time I promised my self NEVER to go back!! The new staff was so rude!! I made a reservation for my Anniversary on the internet, and the day of check in I was told by the hotel staff that they do not have my reservation!** 1) I was transferred around back and forth from the hotel staff to the reservations hotline. 2) Staff was extremely rude! Not arrogant, but rude! Like they hated thier job. 3) They offered check in at 1pm but the room wasn't ready till 3pm! 4) There were stains everywhere! 5) Because of the high sales of rooms due to popularity on this site, they must have hired a cheap unfriendly staff.\n", -1, 0], [857, "amalfi", "this is my letter to the management..... Sir or Madam: I am writing to give feedback about our recent stay the Amalfi. We were a guest from 11/20 to 11/23. During our stay we used the \"Valet\" Service operated through Standard Parking. Our vehicle was returned with stolen items from the glove compartments. Much to my chagrin, $44/day valet service did not include proper security/monitoring, despite the premium over \"self park\". I understand that these parking services are sub-contracted by the hotel, but I would think that any worthy hotel would remedy the situation. This was not the case. I hope that your staff will be able to take measures to rectify the situation for future guests\n", -1, 0], [1076, "monaco", "My wife and I brought our daughter downtown for a blowout \"American Girl\" Weekend and chose the Monaco because of it's glowing reviews. We arrived late and maybe that's when they put out their second-stringers, but we felt unwelcome by the desk staff--like we were an intrusion. I'll never understand this--they're in the hospitality business and they're inhospitable! (This is getting picky, but the reception desk which is cleverly designed to look like a vintage Louis Vuitton trunk needs some maintenance. The repeated \"HM\" initials are peeling off--looks like they used rub-downs where they should have silk screened for durability). When we got to our room we found the maid's ratty work shoes at the foot of the bed (yuck!). I'm still trying to figure out that scenario. There were no ashes--so I've ruled out spontaneous combustion. Also, to the disappointment of my daughter, the much-advertised goldfish was MIA. The bellhop (who apologized for the shoes) explained that they take away the fish when they turn down the bed \"...is that OK?\" he said. I think the proper response at a hotel like this would have been to bring up a stinking 35C/ fish to make a tired 5-year-old happy. On the up side, the rooms are nice and have an over-the-top decoration that my daughter loved (\"I'd like to live here!\" she said). The bed is VERY comfortable--my wife wants the same brand now. The bathroom is nicely appointed with quality materials and good strong shower--except for the cheap fall-apart-while-you're-using-it toilet paper. Come on Kimpton! How much can a decent roll cost? The view towards the river is great (try to get one) and my daughter loved the upholstered wide ledge by the window--she closed the curtains and was in her own \"club house\" watching the world go by from from high above the city. In short: very nice hotel--desk staff at night could be nicer (wouldn't cost anything and would have made up for the maid's shoes!)\n", -1, 0], [838, "allegro", "As a frequent traveler to Chicago, I generally stay at the Sutton Court, but thought I would try a different boutique hotel. I will never stay at this hotel again. The first room they brought me to -- their standard room -- was a glorified closet, leaving me absolutely claustrophobic! Actually the smallest hotel room I've been in in the U.S! I complained to the front desk, who then moved me to a \"premium\" room -- still quite small, but manageably so. The bathroom was tiny, without a vanity, making it difficult to put your toiletries in the room. The location leaves much to be desired, as my room looked out directly onto the El (elevated subway - background noise), and the street was pretty deserted on a Sunday evening. I will say that the free wi-fi was great. If you can find a chain or other hotel closer to Michigan Avene, I'd highly recommend you take that. If you want a nice room in a great location, check out Sutton Place hotel instead.\n", -1, 0], [1009, "intercontinental", "Good location and looks like a good property but did not seem to be managed well. Front desk staff was inattentive to customers and slow. Nice large suite for a room but plumbing fixtures were in disrepair (housekeeping staff could/should have reported each day) - partially clogged shower head, dripping sink, etc. Clean and OK, but neglected - we expected more from an Intercontinental Hotel. Many hotels to choose from in this area of Chicago - can get more for the price from almost any other.\n", -1, 0]]